

THE STATE AND REVOLUTION


The Marxist Theory of the State & the Tasks of the Proletariat in the Revolution

V.I. Lenin

WRITTEN: August - September, 1917

SOURCE: Collected Works, Volume 25, p. 381-492

FIRST PUBLISHED: 1918

TRANSCRIPTION\MARKUP: Zodiac and Brian Baggins

ONLINE VERSION: Lenin Internet Archive (marxists.org) 1993, 1999

CONVERTED TO EBOOK FORMAT BY: anonymous


Note from the Lenin Internet Archive

Lenin wrote _The State and Revolution_ in August and September 1917,
when he was in hiding from persecution of the Provisional Government.
The need for such a theoretical work as this was mentioned by Lenin in
the second half of 1916. It was then that he wrote his note on "The
Youth International", in which he criticised Bukharin's position on the
question of the state and promised to write a detailed article on what
he thought to be the Marxist attitude to the state. In a letter to A. M.
Kollontai on February 17 (N.S.), 1917, he said that he had almost got
ready material on that question . This material was written in a small
blue-covered notebook headed "Marxism on the State". In it Lenin had
collected quotations from the works of Marx and Engels, and extracts
from the books by Kautsky, Pannekoek and Bernstein with his own critical
notes, conclusions and generalisations.

When Lenin left Switzerland for Russia in April 1917, he feared arrest
by the Provisional Government and left the manuscript of "Marxism on the
State" behind — as it would have been destroyed had he been caught. When
in hiding after the July events, Lenin wrote in a note:

  "_Entre nous_, if I am knocked off, I ask you to publish my notebook
  'Marxism on the State' (it got held up in Stockholm). It is bound in a
  blue cover. All the quotations from Marx and Engels are collected
  there, also those from Kautsky against Pannekoek. There are a number
  of remarks, notes and formulas. I think a week's work would be enough
  to publish it. I consider it important because not only Plekhanov, but
  Kautsky, too, is _confused_...." When Lenin received his notebook from
  Stockholm, he used the material he had collected as a basis for his
  book _The State and Revolution_.

According to Lenin's plan, _The State and Revolution_ was to have
consisted of seven chapters, but he did not write the seventh, "The
Experience of the Russian Revolutions of 1905 and 1917", and only a
detailed plan has remained. In a note to the publisher Lenin wrote that
if he "was too slow in competing this, the seventh chapter, or should it
turn out to be too bulky, the first six chapters should be published
separately as Book One."

Originally, the name F.F. Ivanovsky is shown on the first page of the
notebook manuscript as that of the author. Lenin intended to publish the
book under that pseudonym, otherwise the Provisional Government would
have confiscated it for his name alone. The book, however, was not
printed until 1918, when there was no longer any need for the pseudonym.
The second edition appeared in 1919; in this revision Lenin added to
Chapter II a new section "The Presentation of the Question by Marx in
1852".


Preface to the First Edition

The question of the state is now acquiring particular importance both in
theory and in practical politics. The imperialist war has immensely
accelerated and intensified the process of transformation of monopoly
capitalism into state-monopoly capitalism. The monstrous oppression of
the working people by the state, which is merging more and more with the
all-powerful capitalist associations, is becoming increasingly
monstrous. The advanced countries - we mean their hinterland - are
becoming military convict prisons for the workers.

The unprecedented horrors and miseries of the protracted war are making
the people's position unbearable and increasing their anger. The world
proletarian revolution is clearly maturing. The question of its relation
to the state is acquiring practical importance.

The elements of opportunism that accumulated over the decades of
comparatively peaceful development have given rise to the trend of
social-chauvinism which dominated the official socialist parties
throughout the world. This trend - socialism in words and chauvinism in
deeds (Plekhanov, Potresov, Breshkovskaya, Rubanovich, and, in a
slightly veiled form, Tsereteli, Chernov and Co. in Russia; Scheidemann.
Legien, David and others in Germany; Renaudel, Guesde and Vandervelde in
France and Belgium; Hyndman and the Fabians¹ in England, etc., etc.) -
is conspicuous for the base, servile adaptation of the "leaders of
socialism" to the interests not only of "their" national bourgeoisie,
but of "their" state, for the majority of the so-called Great Powers
have long been exploiting and enslaving a whole number of small and weak
nations. And the imperialist war is a war for the division and
redivision of this kind of booty. The struggle to free the working
people from the influence of the bourgeoisie in general, and of the
imperialist bourgeoisie in particular, is impossible without a struggle
against opportunist prejudices concerning the "state".

First of all we examine the theory of Marx and Engels of the state, and
dwell in particular detail on those aspects of this theory which are
ignored or have been distorted by the opportunists. Then we deal
specially with the one who is chiefly responsible for these distortions,
Karl Kautsky, the best-known leader of the Second International
(1889-1914), which has met with such miserable bankruptcy in the present
war. Lastly, we sum up the main results of the experience of the Russian
revolutions of 1905 and particularly of 1917. Apparently, the latter is
now (early August 1917) completing the first stage of its development;
but this revolution as a whole can only be understood as a link in a
chain of socialist proletarian revolutions being caused by the
imperialist war. The question of the relation of the socialist
proletarian revolution to the state, therefore, is acquiring not only
practical political importance, but also the significance of a most
urgent problem of the day, the problem of explaining to the masses what
they will have to do before long to free themselves from capitalist
tyranny.

_THE AUTHOR_

August 1917


Preface to the Second Edition

The present, second edition is published virtually unaltered, except
that section 3 had been added to Chapter II.

_THE AUTHOR_

Moscow, December 17, 1918


Chapter I: Class Society and the State

1. The State: A Product of the Irreconcilability of Class Antagonisms

What is now happening to Marx's theory has, in the course of history,
happened repeatedly to the theories of revolutionary thinkers and
leaders of oppressed classes fighting for emancipation. During the
lifetime of great revolutionaries, the oppressing classes constantly
hounded them, received their theories with the most savage malice, the
most furious hatred and the most unscrupulous campaigns of lies and
slander. After their death, attempts are made to convert them into
harmless icons, to canonize them, so to say, and to hallow their _names_
to a certain extent for the “consolation” of the oppressed classes and
with the object of duping the latter, while at the same time robbing the
revolutionary theory of its _substance_, blunting its revolutionary edge
and vulgarizing it. Today, the bourgeoisie and the opportunists within
the labor movement concur in this doctoring of Marxism. They omit,
obscure, or distort the revolutionary side of this theory, its
revolutionary soul. They push to the foreground and extol what is or
seems acceptable to the bourgeoisie. All the social-chauvinists are now
“Marxists” (don't laugh!). And more and more frequently German bourgeois
scholars, only yesterday specialists in the annihilation of Marxism, are
speaking of the “national-German” Marx, who, they claim, educated the
labor unions which are so splendidly organized for the purpose of waging
a predatory war!

In these circumstances, in view of the unprecedently wide-spread
distortion of Marxism, our prime task is to re-establish what Marx
really taught on the subject of the state. This will necessitate a
number of long quotations from the works of Marx and Engels themselves.
Of course, long quotations will render the text cumbersome and not help
at all to make it popular reading, but we cannot possibly dispense with
them. All, or at any rate all the most essential passages in the works
of Marx and Engels on the subject of the state must by all means be
quoted as fully as possible so that the reader may form an independent
opinion of the totality of the views of the founders of scientific
socialism, and of the evolution of those views, and so that their
distortion by the “Kautskyism” now prevailing may be documentarily
proved and clearly demonstrated.

Let us being with the most popular of Engels' works, The Origin of the
Family, Private Property and the State, the sixth edition of which was
published in Stuttgart as far back as 1894. We have to translate the
quotations from the German originals, as the Russian translations, while
very numerous, are for the most part either incomplete or very
unsatisfactory.

Summing up his historical analysis, Engels says:

  “The state is, therefore, by no means a power forced on society from
  without; just as little is it 'the reality of the ethical idea', 'the
  image and reality of reason', as Hegel maintains. Rather, it is a
  product of society at a certain stage of development; it is the
  admission that this society has become entangled in an insoluble
  contradiction with itself, that it has split into irreconcilable
  antagonisms which it is powerless to dispel. But in order that these
  antagonisms, these classes with conflicting economic interests, might
  not consume themselves and society in fruitless struggle, it became
  necessary to have a power, seemingly standing above society, that
  would alleviate the conflict and keep it within the bounds of 'order';
  and this power, arisen out of society but placing itself above it, and
  alienating itself more and more from it, is the state." (Pp.177-78,
  sixth edition)²

This expresses with perfect clarity the basic idea of Marxism with
regard to the historical role and the meaning of the state. The state is
a product and a manifestation of the irreconcilability of class
antagonisms. The state arises where, when and insofar as class
antagonism objectively cannot be reconciled. And, conversely, the
existence of the state proves that the class antagonisms are
irreconcilable.

It is on this most important and fundamental point that the distortion
of Marxism, proceeding along two main lines, begins.

On the one hand, the bourgeois, and particularly the petty-bourgeois,
ideologists, compelled under the weight of indisputable historical facts
to admit that the state only exists where there are class antagonisms
and a class struggle, “correct” Marx in such a way as to make it appear
that the state is an organ for the reconciliation of classes. According
to Marx, the state could neither have arisen nor maintained itself had
it been possible to reconcile classes. From what the petty-bourgeois and
philistine professors and publicists say, with quite frequent and
benevolent references to Marx, it appears that the state does reconcile
classes. According to Marx, the state is an organ of class rule, an
organ for the oppression of one class by another; it is the creation of
“order”, which legalizes and perpetuates this oppression by moderating
the conflict between classes. In the opinion of the petty-bourgeois
politicians, however, order means the reconciliation of classes, and not
the oppression of one class by another; to alleviate the conflict means
reconciling classes and not depriving the oppressed classes of definite
means and methods of struggle to overthrow the oppressors.

For instance, when, in the revolution of 1917, the question of the
significance and role of the state arose in all its magnitude as a
practical question demanding immediate action, and, moreover, action on
a mass scale, all the Social-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks descended at
once to the petty-bourgeois theory that the “state” “reconciles”
classes. Innumerable resolutions and articles by politicians of both
these parties are thoroughly saturated with this petty-bourgeois and
philistine “reconciliation” theory. That the state is an organ of the
rule of a definite class which cannot be reconciled with its antipode
(the class opposite to it) is something the petty-bourgeois democrats
will never be able to understand. Their attitude to the state is one of
the most striking manifestations of the fact that our Socialist-
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks are not socialists at all (a point that
we Bolsheviks have always maintained), but petty-bourgeois democrats
using near-socialist phraseology.

On the other hand, the “Kautskyite” distortion of Marxism is far more
subtle. “Theoretically”, it is not denied that the state is an organ of
class rule, or that class antagonisms are irreconcilable. But what is
overlooked or glossed over is this: if the state is the product of the
irreconcilability of class antagonisms, if it is a power standing above
society and “alienating itself more and more from it", it is clear that
the liberation of the oppressed class is impossible not only without a
violent revolution, but also without the destruction of the apparatus of
state power which was created by the ruling class and which is the
embodiment of this “alienation”. As we shall see later, Marx very
explicitly drew this theoretically self-evident conclusion on the
strength of a concrete historical analysis of the tasks of the
revolution. And — as we shall show in detail further on — it is this
conclusion which Kautsky has “forgotten” and distorted.

2. Special Bodies of Armed Men, Prisons, etc.

Engels continues:

  “As distinct from the old gentile [tribal or clan] order,[2] the
  state, first, divides its subjects according to territory...."

This division seems “natural” to us, but it costs a prolonged struggle
against the old organization according to generations or tribes.

  “The second distinguishing feature is the establishment of a public
  power which no longer directly coincides with the population
  organizing itself as an armed force. This special, public power is
  necessary because a self-acting armed organization of the population
  has become impossible since the split into classes.... This public
  power exists in every state; it consists not merely of armed men but
  also of material adjuncts, prisons, and institutions of coercion of
  all kinds, of which gentile [clan] society knew nothing...."

Engels elucidates the concept of the “power” which is called the state,
a power which arose from society but places itself above it and
alienates itself more and more from it. What does this power mainly
consist of? It consists of special bodies of armed men having prisons,
etc., at their command.

We are justified in speaking of special bodies of armed men, because the
public power which is an attribute of every state “does not directly
coincide” with the armed population, with its “self-acting armed
organization".

Like all great revolutionary thinkers, Engels tries to draw the
attention of the class-conscious workers to what prevailing philistinism
regards as least worthy of attention, as the most habitual thing,
hallowed by prejudices that are not only deep-rooted but, one might say,
petrified. A standing army and police are the chief instruments of state
power. But how can it be otherwise?

From the viewpoint of the vast majority of Europeans of the end of the
19th century, whom Engels was addressing, and who had not gone through
or closely observed a single great revolution, it could not have been
otherwise. They could not understand at all what a “self-acting armed
organization of the population” was. When asked why it became necessary
to have special bodies of armed men placed above society and alienating
themselves from it (police and a standing army), the West-European and
Russian philistines are inclined to utter a few phrases borrowed from
Spencer of Mikhailovsky, to refer to the growing complexity of social
life, the differentiation of functions, and so on.

Such a reference seems “scientific”, and effectively lulls the ordinary
person to sleep by obscuring the important and basic fact, namely, the
split of society into irreconcilable antagonistic classes.

Were it not for this split, the “self-acting armed organization of the
population” would differ from the primitive organization of a
stick-wielding herd of monkeys, or of primitive men, or of men united in
clans, by its complexity, its high technical level, and so on. But such
an organization would still be possible.

It is impossible because civilized society is split into antagonistic,
and, moreover, irreconcilably antagonistic classes, whose “self-acting”
arming would lead to an armed struggle between them. A state arises, a
special power is created, special bodies of armed men, and every
revolution, by destroying the state apparatus, shows us the naked class
struggle, clearly shows us how the ruling class strives to restore the
special bodies of armed men which serve it, and how the oppressed class
strives to create a new organization of this kind, capable of serving
the exploited instead of the exploiters.

In the above argument, Engels raises theoretically the very same
question which every great revolution raises before us in practice,
palpably and, what is more, on a scale of mass action, namely, the
question of the relationship between “special” bodies of armed men and
the “self-acting armed organization of the population". We shall see how
this question is specifically illustrated by the experience of the
European and Russian revolutions.

But to return to Engel's exposition.

He points out that sometimes — in certain parts of North America, for
example — this public power is weak (he has in mind a rare exception in
capitalist society, and those parts of North America in its
pre-imperialist days where the free colonists predominated), but that,
generally speaking, it grows stronger:

  “It [the public power] grows stronger, however, in proportion as class
  antagonisms within the state become more acute, and as adjacent states
  become larger and more populous. We have only to look at our
  present-day Europe, where class struggle and rivalry in conquest have
  tuned up the public power to such a pitch that it threatens to swallow
  the whole of society and even the state."

This was written not later than the early nineties of the last century,
Engel's last preface being dated June 16, 1891. The turn towards
imperialism — meaning the complete domination of the trusts, the
omnipotence of the big banks, a grand-scale colonial policy, and so
forth — was only just beginning in France, and was even weaker in North
America and in Germany. Since then “rivalry in conquest” has taken a
gigantic stride, all the more because by the beginning of the second
decade of the 20th century the world had been completely divided up
among these “rivals in conquest", i.e., among the predatory Great
Powers. Since then, military and naval armaments have grown
fantastically and the predatory war of 1914-17 for the domination of the
world by Britain or Germany, for the division of the spoils, has brought
the “swallowing” of all the forces of society by the rapacious state
power close to complete catastrophe.

Engels' could, as early as 1891, point to “rivalry in conquest" as one
of the most important distinguishing features of the foreign policy of
the Great Powers, while the social-chauvinist scoundrels have ever since
1914, when this rivalry, many time intensified, gave rise to an
imperialist war, been covering up the defence of the predatory interests
of “their own" bourgeoisie with phrases about “defence of the
fatherland", “defence of the republic and the revolution", etc.!

3. The State: an Instrument for the Exploitation of the Oppressed Class

The maintenance of the special public power standing above society
requires taxes and state loans.

  “Having pubic power and the right to levy taxes,” Engels writes, “the
  officials now stand, as organs of society, above society. The free,
  voluntary respect that was accorded to the organs of the gentile
  [clan] constitution does not satisfy them, even if they could gain
  it....” Special laws are enacted proclaiming the sanctity and immunity
  of the officials. “The shabbiest police servant” has more “authority”
  than the representative of the clan, but even the head of the military
  power of a civilized state may well envy the elder of a clan the
  “unrestrained respect” of society.

The question of the privileged position of the officials as organs of
state power is raised here. The main point indicated is: what is it that
places them above society? We shall see how this theoretical question
was answered in practice by the Paris Commune in 1871 and how it was
obscured from a reactionary standpoint by kautsky in 1912.

  “Because the state arose from the need to hold class antagonisms in
  check, but because it arose, at the same time, in the midst of the
  conflict of these classes, it is, as a rule, the state of the most
  powerful, economically dominant class, which, through the medium of
  the state, becomes also the politically dominant class, and thus
  acquires new means of holding down and exploiting the oppressed
  class....” The ancient and feudal states were organs for the
  exploitation of the slaves and serfs; likewise, “the modern
  representative state is an instrument of exploitation of wage-labor by
  capital. By way of exception, however, periods occur in which the
  warring classes balance each other so nearly that the state power as
  ostensible mediator acquires, for the moment, a certain degree of
  independence of both....” Such were the absolute monarchies of the
  17th and 18th centuries, the Bonapartism of the First and Second
  Empires in France, and the Bismarck regime in Germany.

Such, we may add, is the Kerensky government in republican Russia since
it began to persecute the revolutionary proletariat, at a moment when,
owing to the leadership of the petty-bourgeois democrats, the Soviets
have already become impotent, while the bourgeoisie are not yet strong
enough simply to disperse them.

In a democratic republic, Engels continues, “wealth exercises its power
indirectly, but all the more surely", first, by means of the “direct
corruption of officials” (America); secondly, by means of an “alliance
of the government and the Stock Exchange" (France and America).

At present, imperialism and the domination of the banks have “developed”
into an exceptional art both these methods of upholding and giving
effect to the omnipotence of wealth in democratic republics of all
descriptions. Since, for instance, in the very first months of the
Russian democratic republic, one might say during the honeymoon of the
“socialist” S.R.s and Mensheviks joined in wedlock to the bourgeoisie,
in the coalition government. Mr. Palchinsky obstructed every measure
intended for curbing the capitalists and their marauding practices,
their plundering of the state by means of war contracts; and since later
on Mr. Palchinsky, upon resigning from the Cabinet (and being, of
course, replaced by another quite similar Palchinsky), was “rewarded” by
the capitalists with a lucrative job with a salary of 120,000 rubles per
annum — what would you call that? Direct or indirect bribery? An
alliance of the government and the syndicates, or “merely” friendly
relations? What role do the Chernovs, Tseretelis, Avksentyevs and
Skobelevs play? Are they the “direct” or only the indirect allies of the
millionaire treasury-looters?

Another reason why the omnipotence of “wealth” is more certain in a
democratic republic is that it does not depend on defects in the
political machinery or on the faulty political shell of capitalism. A
democratic republic is the best possible political shell for capitalism,
and, therefore, once capital has gained possession of this very best
shell (through the Palchinskys, Chernovs, Tseretelis and Co.), it
establishes its power so securely, so firmly, that no change of persons,
institutions or parties in the bourgeois-democratic republic can shake
it.

We must also note that Engels is most explicit in calling universal
suffrage as well an instrument of bourgeois rule. Universal suffrage, he
says, obviously taking account of the long experience of German
Social-Democracy, is

  “the gauge of the maturity of the working class. It cannot and never
  will be anything more in the present-day state."

The petty-bourgeois democrats, such as our Socialist-Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks, and also their twin brothers, all the social-chauvinists and
opportunists of Western Europe, expect just this “more” from universal
suffrage. They themselves share, and instil into the minds of the
people, the false notion that universal suffrage “in the present-day
state" is really capable of revealing the will of the majority of the
working people and of securing its realization.

Here, we can only indicate this false notion, only point out that
Engels' perfectly clear statement is distorted at every step in the
propaganda and agitation of the “official” (i.e., opportunist) socialist
parties. A detailed exposure of the utter falsity of this notion which
engels brushes aside here is given in our further account of the views
of Marx and Engels on the “present-day” state.

Engels gives a general summary of his views in the most popular of his
works in the following words:

  “The state, then, has not existed from all eternity. There have been
  societies that did without it, that had no idea of the state and state
  power. At a certain stage of economic development, which was
  necessarily bound up with the split of society into classes, the state
  became a necessity owing to this split. We are now rapidly approaching
  a stage in the development of production at which the existence of
  these classes not only will have ceased to be a necessity, but will
  become a positive hindrance to production. They will fall as they
  arose at an earlier stage. Along with them the state will inevitably
  fall. Society, which will reorganize production on the basis of a free
  and equal association of the producers, will put the whole machinery
  of state where it will then belong: into a museum of antiquities, by
  the side of the spinning-wheel and the bronze axe."

We do not often come across this passage in the propaganda and agitation
literature of the present-day Social-Democrats. Even when we do come
across it, it is mostly quoted in the same manner as one bows before an
icon, i.e., it is done to show official respect for Engels, and no
attempt is made to gauge the breadth and depth of the revolution that
this relegating of “the whole machinery of state to a museum of
antiquities” implies. In most cases we do not even find an understanding
of what Engels calls the state machine.

4. The “Withering Away” of the State, and Violent Revolution

Engel's words regarding the “withering away” of the state are so widely
known, they are often quoted, and so clearly reveal the essence of the
customary adaptation of Marxism to opportunism that we must deal with
them in detail. We shall quote the whole argument from which they are
taken.

  “The proletariat seizes from state power and turns the means of
  production into state property to begin with. But thereby it abolishes
  itself as the proletariat, abolishes all class distinctions and class
  antagonisms, and abolishes also the state as state. Society thus far,
  operating amid class antagonisms, needed the state, that is, an
  organization of the particular exploiting class, for the maintenance
  of its external conditions of production, and, therefore, especially,
  for the purpose of forcibly keeping the exploited class in the
  conditions of oppression determined by the given mode of production
  (slavery, serfdom or bondage, wage-labor). The state was the official
  representative of society as a whole, its concentration in a visible
  corporation. But it was this only insofar as it was the state of that
  class which itself represented, for its own time, society as a whole:
  in ancient times, the state of slave-owning citizens; in the Middle
  Ages, of the feudal nobility; in our own time, of the bourgeoisie.
  When at last it becomes the real representative of the whole of
  society, it renders itself unnecessary. As soon as there is no longer
  any social class to be held in subjection, as soon as class rule, and
  the individual struggle for existence based upon the present anarchy
  in production, with the collisions and excesses arising from this
  struggle, are removed, nothing more remains to be held in subjection —
  nothing necessitating a special coercive force, a state. The first act
  by which the state really comes forward as the representative of the
  whole of society — the taking possession of the means of production in
  the name of society — is also its last independent act as a state.
  State interference in social relations becomes, in one domain after
  another, superfluous, and then dies down of itself. The government of
  persons is replaced by the administration of things, and by the
  conduct of processes of production. The state is not 'abolished'. It
  withers away. This gives the measure of the value of the phrase 'a
  free people's state', both as to its justifiable use for a long time
  from an agitational point of view, and as to its ultimate scientific
  insufficiency; and also of the so-called anarchists' demand that the
  state be abolished overnight." (Herr Eugen Duhring's Revolution in
  Science [Anti-Duhring], pp.301-03, third German edition.)³

It is safe to say that of this argument of Engels', which is so
remarkably rich in ideas, only one point has become an integral part of
socialist thought among modern socialist parties, namely, that according
to Marx that state “withers away” — as distinct from the anarchist
doctrine of the “abolition” of the state. To prune Marxism to such an
extent means reducing it to opportunism, for this “interpretation” only
leaves a vague notion of a slow, even, gradual change, of absence of
leaps and storms, of absence of revolution. The current, widespread,
popular, if one may say so, conception of the “withering away" of the
state undoubtedly means obscuring, if not repudiating, revolution.

Such an “interpretation”, however, is the crudest distortion of Marxism,
advantageous only to the bourgeoisie. In point of theory, it is based on
disregard for the most important circumstances and considerations
indicated in, say, Engels' “summary” argument we have just quoted in
full.

In the first place, at the very outset of his argument, Engels says
that, in seizing state power, the proletariat thereby “abolishes the
state as state". It is not done to ponder over over the meaning of this.
Generally, it is either ignored altogether, or is considered to be
something in the nature of “Hegelian weakness” on Engels' part. As a
matter of fact, however, these words briefly express the experience of
one of the greatest proletarian revolutions, the Paris Commune of 1871,
of which we shall speak in greater detail in its proper place. As a
matter of fact, Engels speaks here of the proletariat revolution
“abolishing” the _bourgeois_ state, while the words about the state
withering away refer to the remnants of the _proletarian_ state _after_
the socialist revolution. According to Engels, the bourgeois state does
not “wither away", but is “abolished” by the proletariat in the course
of the revolution. What withers away after this revolution is the
proletarian state or semi-state.

Secondly, the state is a “special coercive force". Engels gives this
splendid and extremely profound definition here with the utmost
lucidity. And from it follows that the “special coercive force” for the
suppression of the proletariat by the bourgeoisie, of millions of
working people by handfuls of the rich, must be replaced by a “special
coercive force” for the suppression of the bourgeoisie by the
proletariat (the dictatorship of the proletariat). This is precisely
what is meant by “abolition of the state as state". This is precisely
the “act” of taking possession of the means of production in the name of
society. And it is self-evident that such a replacement of one
(bourgeois) “special force” by another (proletarian) “special force”
cannot possibly take place in the form of “withering away".

Thirdly, in speaking of the state “withering away", and the even more
graphic and colorful “dying down of itself", Engels refers quite clearly
and definitely to the period after “the state has taken possession of
the means of production in the name of the whole of society", that is,
after the socialist revolution. We all know that the political form of
the “state” at that time is the most complete democracy. But it never
enters the head of any of the opportunists, who shamelessly distort
Marxism, that Engels is consequently speaking here of democracy “dying
down of itself", or “withering away". This seems very strange at first
sight. But is is “incomprehensible” only to those who have not thought
about democracy also being a state and, consequently, also disappearing
when the state disappears. Revolution alone can “abolish” the bourgeois
state. The state in general, i.e., the most complete democracy, can only
“wither away".

Fourthly, after formulating his famous proposition that “the state
withers away", Engels at once explains specifically that this
proposition is directed against both the opportunists and the
anarchists. In doing this, Engels puts in the forefront that conclusion,
drawn from the proposition that “the state withers away", which is
directed against the opportunists.

One can wager that out of every 10,000 persons who have read or heard
about the “withering away” of the state, 9,990 are completely unaware,
or do not remember, that Engels directed his conclusions from that
proposition not against anarchists alone. And of the remaining 10,
probably nine do not know the meaning of a “free people's state” or why
an attack on this slogan means an attack on opportunists. This is how
history is written! This is how a great revolutionary teaching is
imperceptibly falsified and adapted to prevailing philistinism. The
conclusion directed against the anarchists has been repeated thousands
of times; it has been vulgarized, and rammed into people's heads in the
shallowest form, and has acquired the strength of a prejudice, whereas
the conclusion directed against the opportunists has been obscured and
“forgotten”!

The “free people's state” was a programme demand and a catchword current
among the German Social-Democrats in the seventies. this catchword is
devoid of all political content except that it describes the concept of
democracy in a pompous philistine fashion. Insofar as it hinted in a
legally permissible manner at a democratic republic, Engels was prepared
to “justify” its use “for a time” from an agitational point of view. But
it was an opportunist catchword, for it amounted to something more than
prettifying bourgeois democracy, and was also failure to understand the
socialist criticism of the state in general. We are in favor of a
democratic republic as the best form of state for the proletariat under
capitalism. But we have no right to forget that wage slavery is the lot
of the people even in the most democratic bourgeois republic.
Furthermore, every state is a “special force” for the suppression of the
oppressed class. Consequently, every state is not “free” and not a
“people's state". Marx and Engels explained this repeatedly to their
party comrades in the seventies.

Fifthly, the same work of Engels', whose arguments about the withering
away of the state everyone remembers, also contains an argument of the
significance of violent revolution. Engels' historical analysis of its
role becomes a veritable panegyric on violent revolution. This, “no one
remembers". It is not done in modern socialist parties to talk or even
think about the significance of this idea, and it plays no part whatever
in their daily propaganda and agitation among the people. And yet it is
inseparably bound up with the 'withering away" of the state into one
harmonious whole.

Here is Engels' argument:

  “...That force, however, plays yet another role [other than that of a
  diabolical power] in history, a revolutionary role; that, in the words
  of Marx, it is the midwife of every old society which is pregnant with
  a new one, that it is the instrument with which social movement forces
  its way through and shatters the dead, fossilized political forms — of
  this there is not a word in Herr Duhring. It is only with sighs and
  groans that he admits the possibility that force will perhaps be
  necessary for the overthrow of an economy based on exploitation —
  unfortunately, because all use of force demoralizes, he says, the
  person who uses it. And this in Germany, where a violent collision —
  which may, after all, be forced on the people — would at least have
  the advantage of wiping out the servility which has penetrated the
  nation's mentality following the humiliation of the Thirty Years'
  War.⁴ And this person's mode of thought — dull, insipid, and impotent
  — presumes to impose itself on the most revolutionary party that
  history has ever known! (p.193, third German edition, Part II, end of
  Chap.IV)

How can this panegyric on violent revolution, which Engels insistently
brought to the attention of the German Social-Democrats between 1878 and
1894, i.e., right up to the time of his death, be combined with the
theory of the 'withering away" of the state to form a single theory?

Usually the two are combined by means of eclecticism, by an unprincipled
or sophistic selection made arbitrarily (or to please the powers that
be) of first one, then another argument, and in 99 cases out of 100, if
not more, it is the idea of the “withering away” that is placed in the
forefront. Dialectics are replaced by eclecticism — this is the most
usual, the most wide-spread practice to be met with in present-day
official Social-Democratic literature in relation to Marxism. This sort
of substitution is, of course, nothing new; it was observed even in the
history of classical Greek philosophy. In falsifying Marxism in
opportunist fashion, the substitution of eclecticism for dialectics is
the easiest way of deceiving the people. It gives an illusory
satisfaction; it seems to take into account all sides of the process,
all trends of development, all the conflicting influences, and so forth,
whereas in reality it provides no integral and revolutionary conception
of the process of social development at all.

We have already said above, and shall show more fully later, that the
theory of Marx and Engels of the inevitability of a violent revolution
refers to the bourgeois state. The latter cannot be superseded by the
proletarian state (the dictatorship of the proletariat) through the
process of 'withering away", but, as a general rule, only through a
violent revolution. The panegyric Engels sang in its honor, and which
fully corresponds to Marx's repeated statements (see the concluding
passages of _The Poverty of Philosophy⁵_ and the _Communist Manifesto⁶_,
with their proud and open proclamation of the inevitability of a violent
revolution; see what Marx wrote nearly 30 years later, in criticizing
the _Gotha Programme of 1875⁷_, when he mercilessly castigated the
opportunist character of that programme) — this panegyric is by no means
a mere “impulse”, a mere declamation or a polemical sally. The necessity
of systematically imbuing the masses with this and precisely this view
of violent revolution lies at the root of the entire theory of Marx and
Engels. The betrayal of their theory by the now prevailing
social-chauvinist and Kautskyite trends expresses itself strikingly in
both these trends ignoring such propaganda and agitation.

The supersession of the bourgeois state by the proletarian state is
impossible without a violent revolution. The abolition of the
proletarian state, i.e., of the state in general, is impossible except
through the process of “withering away".

A detailed and concrete elaboration of these views was given by Marx and
Engels when they studied each particular revolutionary situation, when
they analyzed the lessons of the experience of each particular
revolution. We shall now pass to this, undoubtedly the most important,
part of their theory.


Chapter II: The Experience of 1848-51

1. The Eve of Revolution

The first works of mature Marxism — _The Poverty of Philosophy_ and the
_Communist Manifesto_ — appeared just on the eve of the revolution of
1848. For this reason, in addition to presenting the general principles
of Marxism, they reflect to a certain degree the concrete revolutionary
situation of the time. It will, therefore, be more expedient, perhaps,
to examine what the authors of these works said about the state
immediately before they drew conclusions from the experience of the
years 1848-51.

In _The Poverty of Philosophy_, Marx wrote:

  "The working class, in the course of development, will substitute for
  the old bourgeois society an association which will preclude classes
  and their antagonism, and there will be no more political power
  groups, since the political power is precisely the official expression
  of class antagonism in bourgeois society." (p.182, German edition,
  1885)⁸

It is instructive to compare this general exposition of the idea of the
state disappearing after the abolition of classes with the exposition
contained in the _Communist Manifesto_, written by Marx and Engels a few
months later--in November 1847, to be exact:

  "... In depicting the most general phases of the development of the
  proletariat, we traced the more or less veiled civil war, raging
  within existing society up to the point where that war breaks out into
  open revolution, and where the violent overthrow of the bourgeoisie
  lays the foundation for the sway of the proletariat....

  "... We have seen above that the first step in the revolution by the
  working class is to raise the proletariat to the position of the
  ruling class to win the battle of democracy.

  "The proletariat will use its political supremacy to wrest, by degree,
  all capital from the bourgeoisie, to centralize all instruments of
  production in the hands of the state, i.e., of the proletariat
  organized as the ruling class; and to increase the total productive
  forces as rapidly as possible." (pp.31 and 37, seventh German edition,
  1906)⁹

Here we have a formulation of one of the most remarkable and most
important ideas of Marxism on the subject of the state, namely, the idea
of the "dictatorship of the proletariat" (as Marx and Engels began to
call it after the Paris Commune); and, also, a highly interesting
definition of the state, which is also one of the "forgotten words" of
Marxism: "the state, i.e., the proletariat organized as the ruling
class."

This definition of the state has never been explained in the prevailing
propaganda and agitation literature of the official Social-Democratic
parties. More than that, it has been deliberately ignored, for it is
absolutely irreconcilable with reformism, and is a slap in the face for
the common opportunist prejudices and philistine illusions about the
"peaceful development of democracy".

The proletariat needs the state — this is repeated by all the
opportunists, social-chauvinists and Kautskyites, who assure us that
this is what Marx taught. But they “forget” to add that, in the first
place, according to Marx, the proletariat needs only a state which is
withering away, i.e., a state so constituted that it begins to wither
away immediately, and cannot but wither away. And, secondly, the working
people need a "state, i.e., the proletariat organized as the ruling
class".

The state is a special organization of force: it is an organization of
violence for the suppression of some class. What class must the
proletariat suppress? Naturally, only the exploiting class, i.e., the
bourgeoisie. The working people need the state only to suppress the
resistance of the exploiters, and only the proletariat can direct this
suppression, can carry it out. For the proletariat is the only class
that is consistently revolutionary, the only class that can unite all
the working and exploited people in the struggle against the
bourgeoisie, in completely removing it.

The exploiting classes need political rule to maintain exploitation,
i.e., in the selfish interests of an insignificant minority against the
vast majority of all people. The exploited classes need political rule
in order to completely abolish all exploitation, i.e., in the interests
of the vast majority of the people, and against the insignificant
minority consisting of the modern slave-owners — the landowners and
capitalists.

The petty-bourgeois democrats, those sham socialists who replaced the
class struggle by dreams of class harmony, even pictured the socialist
transformation in a dreamy fashion — not as the overthrow of the rule of
the exploiting class, but as the peaceful submission of the minority to
the majority which has become aware of its aims. This petty-bourgeois
utopia, which is inseparable from the idea of the state being above
classes, led in practice to the betrayal of the interests of the working
classes, as was shown, for example, by the history of the French
revolutions of 1848 and 1871, and by the experience of “socialist”
participation in bourgeois Cabinets in Britain, France, Italy and other
countries at the turn of the century.

All his life Marx fought against this petty-bourgeois socialism, now
revived in Russia by the Socialist-Revolutionary and Menshevik parties.
He developed his theory of the class struggle consistently, down to the
theory of political power, of the state.

The overthrow of bourgeois rule can be accomplished only by the
proletariat, the particular class whose economic conditions of existence
prepare it for this task and provide it with the possibility and the
power to perform it. While the bourgeoisie break up and disintegrate the
peasantry and all the petty-bourgeois groups, they weld together, unite
and organize the proletariat. Only the proletariat — by virtue of the
economic role it plays in large-scale production — is capable of being
the leader of all the working and exploited people, whom the bourgeoisie
exploit, oppress and crush, often not less but more than they do the
proletarians, but who are incapable of waging an independent struggle
for their emancipation.

The theory of class struggle, applied by Marx to the question of the
state and the socialist revolution, leads as a matter of course to the
recognition of the political rule of the proletariat, of its
dictatorship, i.e., of undivided power directly backed by the armed
force of the people. The overthrow of the bourgeoisie can be achieved
only by the proletariat becoming the ruling class, capable of crushing
the inevitable and desperate resistance of the bourgeoisie, and of
organizing all the working and exploited people for the new economic
system.

The proletariat needs state power, a centralized organization of force,
an organization of violence, both to crush the resistance of the
exploiters and to lead the enormous mass of the population — the
peasants, the petty bourgeoisie, and semi-proletarians — in the work of
organizing a socialist economy.

By educating the workers' party, Marxism educates the vanguard of the
proletariat, capable of assuming power and leading the whole people to
socialism, of directing and organizing the new system, of being the
teacher, the guide, the leader of all the working and exploited people
in organizing their social life without the bourgeoisie and against the
bourgeoisie. By contrast, the opportunism now prevailing trains the
members of the workers' party to be the representatives of the
better-paid workers, who lose touch with the masses, "get along" fairly
well under capitalism, and sell their birthright for a mass of pottage,
i.e., renounce their role as revolutionary leaders of the people against
the bourgeoisie.

Marx's theory of "the state, i.e., the proletariat organized as the
ruling class", is inseparably bound up with the whole of his doctrine of
the revolutionary role of the proletariat in history. The culmination of
this rule is the proletarian dictatorship, the political rule of the
proletariat.

But since the proletariat needs the state as a special form of
organization of violence against the bourgeoisie, the following
conclusion suggests itself: is it conceivable that such an organization
can be created without first abolishing, destroying the state machine
created by the bourgeoisie for themselves? _The Communist Manifesto_
leads straight to this conclusion, and it is of this conclusion that
Marx speaks when summing up the experience of the revolution of 1848-51.

2. The Revolution Summed Up

Marx sums up his conclusions from the revolution of 1848-51, on the
subject of the state we are concerned with, in the following argument
contained in The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte:

  "But the revolution is throughgoing. It is still journeying through
  purgatory. It does its work methodically. By December 2, 1851 [the day
  of Louis Bonaparte's coup d'etat], it had completed one half of its
  preparatory work. It is now completing the other half. First it
  perfected the parliamentary power, in order to be able to overthrow
  it. Now that it has attained this, it is perfecting the executive
  power, reducing it to its purest expression, isolating it, setting it
  up against itself as the sole object, in order to concentrate all its
  forces of destruction against it. And when it has done this second
  half of its preliminary work, Europe will leap from its seat and
  exultantly exclaim: well grubbed, old mole!

  "This executive power with its enormous bureaucratic and military
  organization, with its vast and ingenious state machinery, with a host
  of officials numbering half a million, besides an army of another half
  million, this appalling parasitic body, which enmeshes the body of
  French society and chokes all its pores, sprang up in the days of the
  absolute monarchy, with the decay of the feudal system, which it
  helped to hasten." The first French Revolution developed
  centralization, "but at the same time" it increased "the extent, the
  attributes and the number of agents of governmental power. Napoleon
  completed this state machinery". The legitimate monarchy and the July
  monarchy "added nothing but a greater division of labor"....

  "... Finally, in its struggle against the revolution, the
  parliamentary republic found itself compelled to strengthen, along
  with repressive measures, the resources and centralization of
  governmental power. All revolutions perfected this machine instead of
  smashing it. The parties that contended in turn for domination
  regarded the possession of this huge state edifice as the principal
  spoils of the victor." (_The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte_
  pp.98-99, fourth edition, Hamburg, 1907)¹⁰

In this remarkable argument, Marxism takes a tremendous step forward
compared with the _Communist Manifesto_. In the latter, the question of
the state is still treated in an extremely abstract manner, in the most
general terms and expressions. In the above-quoted passage, the question
is treated in a concrete manner, and the conclusion is extremely
precise, definite, practical and palpable: all previous revolutions
perfected the state machine, whereas it must be broken, smashed.

This conclusion is the chief and fundamental point in the Marxist theory
of the state. And it is precisely this fundamental point which has been
completely ignored by the dominant official Social-Democratic parties
and, indeed, distorted (as we shall see later) by the foremost
theoretician of the Second International, Karl Kautsky.

The _Communist Manifesto_ gives a general summary of history, which
compels us to regard the state as the organ of class rule and leads us
to the inevitable conclusion that the proletariat cannot overthrow the
bourgeoisie without first winning political power, without attaining
political supremacy, without transforming the state into the
"proletariat organized as the ruling class"; and that this proletarian
state will begin to wither away immediately after its victory because
the state is unnecessary and cannot exist in a society in which there
are no class antagonisms. The question as to how, from the point of view
of historical development, the replacement of the bourgeois by the
proletarian state is to take place is not raised here.

This is the question Marx raises and answers in 1852. True to his
philosophy of dialectical materialism, Marx takes as his basis the
historical experience of the great years of revolution, 1848 to 1851.
Here, as everywhere else, his theory is a summing up of experience,
illuminated by a profound philosophical conception of the world and a
rich knowledge of history.

The problem of the state is put specifically: How did the bourgeois
state, the state machine necessary for the rule of the bourgeoisie, come
into being historically? What changes did it undergo, what evolution did
it perform in the course of bourgeois revolutions and in the face of the
independent actions of the oppressed classes? What are the tasks of the
proletariat in relation to this state machine?

The centralized state power that is peculiar to bourgeois society came
into being in the period of the fall of absolutism. Two institutions
most characteristic of this state machine are the bureaucracy and the
standing army. In their works, Marx and Engels repeatedly show that the
bourgeoisie are connected with these institutions by thousands of
threads. Every worker's experience illustrates this connection in an
extremely graphic and impressive manner. From its own bitter experience,
the working class learns to recognize this connection. That is why it so
easily grasps and so firmly learns the doctrine which shows the
inevitability of this connection, a doctrine which the petty-bourgeois
democrats either ignorantly and flippantly deny, or still more
flippantly admit "in general", while forgetting to draw appropriate
practical conclusions.

The bureaucracy and the standing army are a “parasite” on the body of
bourgeois society--a parasite created by the internal antagonisms which
rend that society, but a parasite which “chokes” all its vital pores.
The Kautskyite opportunism now prevailing in official Social-Democracy
considers the view that the state is a parasitic organism to be the
peculiar and exclusive attribute of anarchism. It goes without saying
that this distortion of Marxism is of vast advantage to those
philistines who have reduced socialism to the unheard-of disgrace of
justifying and prettifying the imperialist war by applying to it the
concept of "defence of the fatherland"; but it is unquestionably a
distortion, nevertheless.

The development, perfection, and strengthening of the bureaucratic and
military apparatus proceeded during all the numerous bourgeois
revolutions which Europe has witnessed since the fall of feudalism. In
particular, it is the petty bourgeois who are attracted to the side of
the big bourgeoisie and are largely subordinated to them through this
apparatus, which provides the upper sections of the peasants, small
artisans, tradesmen, and the like with comparatively comfortable, quiet,
and respectable jobs raising the holders above the people. Consider what
happened in Russia during the six months following February 27, 1917.
The official posts which formerly were given by preference to the Black
Hundreds have now become the spoils of the Cadets, Mensheviks, and
Social-Revolutionaries. Nobody has really thought of introducing any
serious reforms. Every effort has been made to put them off "until the
Constituent Assembly meets", and to steadily put off its convocation
until after the war! But there has been no delay, no waiting for the
Constituent Assembly, in the matter of dividing the spoils of getting
the lucrative jobs of ministers, deputy ministers, governors-general,
etc., etc.! The game of combinations that has been played in forming the
government has been, in essence, only an expression of this division and
redivision of the “spoils”, which has been going on above and below,
throughout the country, in every department of central and local
government. The six months between February 27 and August 27, 1917, can
be summed up, objectively summed up beyond all dispute, as follows:
reforms shelved, distribution of official jobs accomplished and
“mistakes” in the distribution corrected by a few redistributions.

But the more the bureaucratic apparatus is “redistributed” among the
various bourgeois and petty-bourgeois parties (among the Cadets,
Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks in the case of Russia), the
more keenly aware the oppressed classes, and the proletariat at their
head, become of their irreconcilable hostility to the whole of bourgeois
society. Hence the need for all bourgeois parties, even for the most
democratic and "revolutionary-democratic" among them, to intensify
repressive measures against the revolutionary proletariat, to strengthen
the apparatus of coercion, i.e., the state machine. This course of
events compels the revolution "to concentrate all its forces of
destruction" against the state power, and to set itself the aim, not of
improving the state machine, but of smashing and destroying it.

It was not logical reasoning, but actual developments, the actual
experience of 1848-51, that led to the matter being presented in this
way. The extent to which Marx held strictly to the solid ground of
historical experience can be seen from the fact that, in 1852, he did
not yet specifically raise the question of what was to take the place of
the state machine to be destroyed. Experience had not yet provided
material for dealing with this question, which history placed on the
agenda later on, in 1871. In 1852, all that could be established with
the accuracy of scientific observation was that the proletarian
revolution had approached the task of "concentrating all its forces of
destruction" against the state power, of “smashing” the state machine.

Here the question may arise: is it correct to generalize the experience,
observations and conclusions of Marx, to apply them to a field that is
wider than the history of France during the three years 1848-51? Before
proceeding to deal with this question, let us recall a remark made by
Engels and then examine the facts. In his introduction to the third
edition of _The Eighteenth Brumaire_, Engels wrote:

  "France is the country where, more than anywhere else, the historical
  class struggles were each time fought out to a finish, and where,
  consequently, the changing political forms within which they move and
  in which their results are summarized have been stamped in the
  sharpest outlines. The centre of feudalism in the Middle Ages, the
  model country, since the Renaissance, of a unified monarchy based on
  social estates, France demolished feudalism in the Great Revolution
  and established the rule of the bourgeoisie in a classical purity
  unequalled by any other European land. And the struggle of the
  upward-striving proletariat against the ruling bourgeoisie appeared
  here in an acute form unknown elsewhere." (p.4, 1907 edition)

The last remark is out of date insomuch as since 1871 there has been a
lull in the revolutionary struggle of the French proletariat, although,
long as this lull may be, it does not at all preclude the possibility
that in the coming proletarian revolution France may show herself to be
the classic country of the class struggle to a finish.

Let us, however, cast a general glance over the history of the advanced
countries at the turn of the century. We shall see that the same process
went on more slowly, in more varied forms, in a much wider field: on the
one hand, the development of "parliamentary power" both in the
republican countries (France, America, Switzerland), and in the
monarchies (Britain, Germany to a certain extent, Italy, the Scandinavia
countries, etc.); on the other hand, a struggle for power among the
various bourgeois and petty-bourgeois parties which distributed and
redistributed the “spoils” of office, with the foundations of bourgeois
society unchanged; and, lastly, the perfection and consolidation of the
"executive power", of its bureaucratic and military apparatus.

There is not the slightest doubt that these features are common to the
whole of the modern evolution of all capitalist states in general. In
the last three years 1848-51 France displayed, in a swift, sharp,
concentrated form, the very same processes of development which are
peculiar to the whole capitalist world.

Imperialism--the era of bank capital, the era of gigantic capitalist
monopolies, of the development of monopoly capitalism into
state-monopoly capitalism--has clearly shown an unprecedented growth in
its bureaucratic and military apparatus in connection with the
intensification of repressive measures against the proletariat both in
the monarchical and in the freest, republican countries.

World history is now undoubtedly leading, on an incomparably larger
scale than in 1852, to the "concentration of all the forces" of the
proletarian revolution on the “destruction” of the state machine.

What the proletariat will put in its place is suggested by the highly
instructive material furnished by the Paris Commune.

3. The Presentation of the Question by Marx in 1852

In 1907, Mehring, in the magazine Neue Zeit¹¹ (Vol.XXV, 2, p.164),
published extracts from Marx's letter to Weydemeyer dated March 5, 1852.
This letter, among other things, contains the following remarkable
observation:

  "And now as to myself, no credit is due to me for discovering the
  existence of classes in modern society or the struggle between them.
  Long before me bourgeois historians had described the historical
  development of this class struggle and bourgeois economists, the
  economic anatomy of classes. What I did that was new was to prove: (1)
  that the existence of classes is only bound up with the particular,
  historical phases in the development of production (historische
  Entwicklungsphasen der Produktion), (2) that the class struggle
  necessarily leads to the dictatorship of the proletariat, (3) that
  this dictatorship itself only constitutes the transition to the
  abolition of all classes and to a classless society¹²."

In these words, Marx succeeded in expressing with striking clarity,
first, the chief and radical difference between his theory and that of
the foremost and most profound thinkers of the bourgeoisie; and,
secondly, the essence of his theory of the state.

It is often said and written that the main point in Marx's theory is the
class struggle. But this is wrong. And this wrong notion very often
results in an opportunist distortion of Marxism and its falsification in
a spirit acceptable to the bourgeoisie. For the theory of the class
struggle was created not by Marx, but by the bourgeoisie before Marx,
and, generally speaking, it is acceptable to the bourgeoisie. Those who
recognize only the class struggle are not yet Marxists; they may be
found to be still within the bounds of bourgeois thinking and bourgeois
politics. To confine Marxism to the theory of the class struggle means
curtailing Marxism, distorting it, reducing it to something acceptable
to the bourgeoisie. Only he is a Marxist who extends the recognition of
the class struggle to the recognition of the dictatorship of the
proletariat. That is what constitutes the most profound distinction
between the Marxist and the ordinary petty (as well as big) bourgeois.
This is the touchstone on which the real understanding and recognition
of Marxism should be tested. And it is not surprising that when the
history of Europe brought the working class face to face with this
question as a practical issue, not only all the opportunists and
reformists, but all the Kautskyites (people who vacillate between
reformism and Marxism) proved to be miserable philistines and
petty-bourgeois democrats repudiating the dictatorship of the
proletariat. Kautsky's pamphlet, _The Dictatorship of the Proletariat_,
published in August 1918, i.e., long after the first edition of the
present book, is a perfect example of petty-bourgeois distortion of
Marxism and base renunciation of it in deeds, while hypocritically
recognizing it in words (see my pamphlet, _The Proletarian Revolution
and the Renegade Kautsky_, Petrograd and Moscow, 1918).

Opportunism today, as represented by its principal spokesman, the
ex-Marxist Karl Kautsky, fits in completely with Marx's characterization
of the bourgeois position quoted above, for this opportunism limits
recognition of the class struggle to the sphere of bourgeois relations.
(Within this sphere, within its framework, not a single educated liberal
will refuse to recognize the class struggle "in principle"!) Opportunism
does not extend recognition of the class struggle to the cardinal point,
to the period of transition from capitalism to communism, of the
overthrow and the complete abolition of the bourgeoisie. In reality,
this period inevitably is a period of an unprecedently violent class
struggle in unprecedentedly acute forms, and, consequently, during this
period the state must inevitably be a state that is democratic in a new
way (for the proletariat and the propertyless in general) and
dictatorial in a new way (against the bourgeoisie).

Further. The essence of Marx's theory of the state has been mastered
only by those who realize that the dictatorship of a single class is
necessary not only for every class society in general, not only for the
proletariat which has overthrown the bourgeoisie, but also for the
entire historical period which separates capitalism from "classless
society", from communism. Bourgeois states are most varied in form, but
their essence is the same: all these states, whatever their form, in the
final analysis are inevitably the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie. The
transition from capitalism to communism is certainly bound to yield a
tremendous abundance and variety of political forms, but the essence
will inevitably be the same: the dictatorship of the proletariat.


Chapter III: Experience of the Paris Commune of 1871. Marx's Analysis

1. What Made the Communards' Attempt Heroic?

It is well known that in the autumn of 1870, a few months before the
Commune, Marx warned the Paris workers that any attempt to overthrow the
government would be the folly of despair. But when, in March 1871, a
decisive battle was forced upon the workers and they accepted it, when
the uprising had become a fact, Marx greeted the proletarian revolution
with the greatest enthusiasm, in spite of unfavorable auguries. Marx did
not persist in the pedantic attitude of condemning an “untimely”
movement as did the ill-famed Russian renegade from marxism, Plekhanov,
who in November 1905 wrote encouragingly about the workers' and
peasants' struggle, but after December 1905 cried, liberal fashion:
"They should not have taken up arms."

Marx, however, was not only enthusiastic about the heroism of the
Communards, who, as he expressed it, "stormed heaven". Although the mass
revolutionary movement did not achieve its aim, he regarded it as a
historic experience of enormous importance, as a certain advance of the
world proletarian revolution, as a practical step that was more
important than hundreds of programmes and arguments. Marx endeavored to
analyze this experiment, to draw tactical lessons from it and re-examine
his theory in the light of it.

The only “correction” Marx thought it necessary to make to the
_Communist Manifesto_ he made on the basis of the revolutionary
experience of the Paris Commune.

The last preface to the new German edition of the _Communist Manifesto_,
signed by both its authors, is dated June 24, 1872. In this preface the
authors, Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, say that the programme of the
_Communist Manifesto_ "has in some details become out-of-date", and the
go on to say:

  "... One thing especially was proved by the Commune, _viz._, that 'the
  working class cannot simply lay hold of the ready-made state machinery
  and wield it for its own purposes'...."¹³

The authors took the words that are in single quotation marks in this
passage from Marx's book, _The Civil War in France_.

Thus, Marx and Engels regarded one principal and fundamental lesson of
the Paris Commune as being of such enormous importance that they
introduced it as an important correction into the _Communist Manifesto_.

Most characteristically, it is this important correction that has been
distorted by the opportunists, and its meaning probably is not known to
nine-tenths, if not ninety-nine-hundredths, of the readers of the
_Communist Manifesto_. We shall deal with this distortion more fully
farther on, in a chapter devoted specially to distortions. Here it will
be sufficient to note that the current, vulgar “interpretation” of
Marx's famous statement just quoted is that Marx here allegedly
emphasizes the idea of slow development in contradistinction to the
seizure of power, and so on.

As a matter of fact, the exact opposite is the case. Marx's idea is that
the working class must break up, smash the "ready-made state machinery",
and not confine itself merely to laying hold of it.

On April 12, 1871, i.e., just at the time of the Commune, Marx wrote to
Kugelmann:

  "If you look up the last chapter of my Eighteenth Brumaire, you will
  find that I declare that the next attempt of the French Revolution
  will be no longer, as before, to transfer the bureaucratic-military
  machine from one hand to another, but to smash it [Marx's italics--the
  original is zerbrechen], and this is the precondition for every real
  people's revolution on the Continent. And this is what our heroic
  Party comrades in Paris are attempting." (Neue Zeit, Vol.XX, 1,
  1901-02, p. 709.)¹⁴

  (The letters of Marx to Kugelmann have appeared in Russian in no less
  than two editions, one of which I edited and supplied with a preface.)

The words, "to smash the bureaucratic-military machine", briefly express
the principal lesson of Marxism regarding the tasks of the proletariat
during a revolution in relation to the state. And this is the lesson
that has been not only completely ignored, but positively distorted by
the prevailing, Kautskyite, “interpretation” of Marxism!

As for Marx's reference to _The Eighteenth Brumaire_, we have quoted the
relevant passage in full above.

It is interesting to note, in particular, two points in the above-quoted
argument of Marx. First, he restricts his conclusion to the Continent.
This was understandable in 1871, when Britain was still the model of a
purely capitalist country, but without a militarist clique and, to a
considerable degree, without a bureaucracy. Marx therefore excluded
Britain, where a revolution, even a people's revolution, then seemed
possible, and indeed was possible, _without_ the precondition of
destroying "ready-made state machinery".

Today, in 1917, at the time of the first great imperialist war, this
restriction made by Marx is no longer valid. Both Britain and America,
the biggest and the last representatives — in the whole world — of
Anglo-Saxon “liberty”, in the sense that they had no militarist cliques
and bureaucracy, have completely sunk into the all-European filthy,
bloody morass of bureaucratic-military institutions which subordinate
everything to themselves, and suppress everything. Today, in Britain and
America, too, "the precondition for every real people's revolution" is
the _smashing_, the _destruction_ of the "ready-made state machinery"
(made and brought up to the “European”, general imperialist, perfection
in those countries in the years 1914-17).

Secondly, particular attention should be paid to Marx's extremely
profound remark that the destruction of the bureaucratic-military state
machine is "the precondition for every real _people's_ revolution". This
idea of a "people's revolution seems strange coming from Marx, so that
the Russian Plekhanovites and Mensheviks, those followers of Struve who
wish to be regarded as Marxists, might possibly declare such an
expression to be a "slip of the pen" on Marx's part. They have reduced
Marxism to such a state of wretchedly liberal distortion that nothing
exists for them beyond the antithesis between bourgeois revolution and
proletarian revolution, and even this antithesis they interpret in an
utterly lifeless way.

If we take the revolutions of the 20th century as examples we shall, of
course, have to admit that the Portuguese and the Turkish revolutions
are both bourgeois revolutions. Neither of them, however, is a
"people's" revolution, since in neither does the mass of the people,
their vast majority, come out actively, independently, with their own
economic and political demands to any noticeable degree. By contrast,
although the Russian bourgeois revolution of 1905-07 displayed no such
“brilliant” successes as at time fell to the Portuguese and Turkish
revolutions, it was undoubtedly a "real people's" revolution, since the
mass of the people, their majority, the very lowest social groups,
crushed by oppression and exploitation, rose independently and stamped
on the entire course of the revolution the imprint of _their_ own
demands, _their_ attempt to build in their own way a new society in
place of the old society that was being destroyed.

In Europe, in 1871, the proletariat did not constitute the majority of
the people in any country on the Continent. A "people's" revolution, one
actually sweeping the majority into its stream, could be such only if it
embraced both the proletariat and the peasants. These two classes then
constituted the “people”. These two classes are united by the fact that
the "bureaucratic-military state machine" oppresses, crushes, exploits
them. To _smash_ this machine, to _break it up_, is truly in the
interest of the “people”, of their majority, of the workers and most of
the peasants, is "the precondition" for a free alliance of the poor
peasant and the proletarians, whereas without such an alliance democracy
is unstable and socialist transformation is impossible.

As is well known, the Paris Commune was actually working its way toward
such an alliance, although it did not reach its goal owing to a number
of circumstances, internal and external.

Consequently, in speaking of a "real people's revolution", Marx, without
in the least discounting the special features of the petty bourgeois (he
spoke a great deal about them and often), took strict account of the
actual balance of class forces in most of the continental countries of
Europe in 1871. On the other hand, he stated that the “smashing” of the
state machine was required by the interests of both the workers and the
peasants, that it united them, that it placed before them the common
task of removing the “parasite” and of replacing it by something new.

By what exactly?

2. What is to Replace the Smashed State Machine?

In 1847, in the _Communist Manifesto_, Marx's answer to this question
was as yet a purely abstract one; to be exact, it was an answer that
indicated he tasks, but not the ways of accomplishing them. The answer
given in the _Communist Manifesto_ was that this machine was to be
replaced by "the proletariat organized as the ruling class", by the
"winning of the battle of democracy".

Marx did not indulge in utopias; he expected the _experience_ of the
mass movement to provide the reply to the question as to the specific
forms this organisation of the proletariat as the ruling class would
assume and as to the exact manner in which this organisation would be
combined with the most complete, most consistent "winning of the battle
of democracy."

Marx subjected the experience of the Commune, meagre as it was, to the
most careful analysis in _The Civil War in France_. Let us quote the
most important passages of this work. [All the following quotes in this
Chapter, with one exception, are so citied – Ed.]

  Originating from the Middle Ages, there developed in the 19th century
  "the centralized state power, with its ubiquitous organs of standing
  army, police, bureaucracy, clergy, and judicature." With the
  development of class antagonisms between capital and labor, "state
  power assumed more and more the character of a public force organized
  for the suppression of the working class, of a machine of class rule.
  After every revolution, which marks an advance in the class struggle,
  the purely coercive character of the state power stands out in bolder
  and bolder relief." After the revolution of 1848-49, state power
  became "the national war instruments of capital against labor". The
  Second Empire consolidated this.

  "The direct antithesis to the empire was the Commune." It was the
  "specific form" of "a republic that was not only to remove the
  monarchical form of class rule, but class rule itself."

What was this “specific” form of the proletarian, socialist republic?
What was the state it began to create?

  "The first decree of the Commune, therefore, was the suppression of
  the standing army, and the substitution for it of the armed people."

This demand now figures in the programme of every party calling itself
socialist. The real worth of their programme, however, is best shown by
the behavior of our Social-Revolutionists and mensheviks, who, right
after the revolution of February 27, refused to carry out this demand!

  "The Commune was formed of the municipal councillors, chosen by
  universal suffrage in the various wards of the town, responsible and
  revocable at any time. The majority of its members were naturally
  working men, or acknowledged representatives of the working class....
  The police, which until then had been the instrument of the
  Government, was at once stripped of its political attributes, and
  turned into the responsible, and at all times revocable, agent of the
  Commune. So were the officials of all other branches of the
  administration. From the members of the Commune downwards, the public
  service had to be done at workmen's wages. The privileges and the
  representation allowances of the high dignitaries of state disappeared
  along with the high dignitaries themselves.... Having once got rid of
  the standing army and the police, the instruments of physical force of
  the old government, the Commune proceeded at once to break the
  instrument of spiritual suppression, the power of the priests.... The
  judicial functionaries lost that sham independence... they were
  thenceforward to be elective, responsible, and revocable¹⁵."

The Commune, therefore, appears to have replaced the smashed state
machine “only” by fuller democracy: abolition of the standing army; all
officials to be elected and subject to recall. But as a matter of fact
this “only” signifies a gigantic replacement of certain institutions by
other institutions of a fundamentally different type. This is exactly a
case of "quantity being transformed into quality": democracy, introduced
as fully and consistently as is at all conceivable, is transformed from
bourgeois into proletarian democracy; from the state (= a special force
for the suppression of a particular class) into something which is no
longer the state proper.

It is still necessary to suppress the bourgeoisie and crush their
resistance. This was particularly necessary for the Commune; and one of
the reasons for its defeat was that it did not do this with sufficient
determination. The organ of suppression, however, is here the majority
of the population, and not a minority, as was always the case under
slavery, serfdom, and wage slavery. And since the majority of people
itself suppresses its oppressors, a 'special force" for suppression is
no longer necessary! In this sense, the state begins to wither away.
Instead of the special institutions of a privileged minority (privileged
officialdom, the chiefs of the standing army), the majority itself can
directly fulfil all these functions, and the more the functions of state
power are performed by the people as a whole, the less need there is for
the existence of this power.

In this connection, the following measures of the Commune, emphasized by
Marx, are particularly noteworthy: the abolition of all representation
allowances, and of all monetary privileges to officials, the reduction
of the remuneration of all servants of the state to the level of
"workmen's wages". This shows more clearly than anything else the turn
from bourgeois to proletarian democracy, from the democracy of the
oppressors to that of the oppressed classes, from the state as a
"special force" for the suppression of a particular class to the
suppression of the oppressors by the general force of the majority of
the people--the workers and the peasants. And it is on this particularly
striking point, perhaps the most important as far as the problem of the
state is concerned, that the ideas of Marx have been most completely
ignored! In popular commentaries, the number of which is legion, this is
not mentioned. The thing done is to keep silent about it as if it were a
piece of old-fashioned “naivete”, just as Christians, after their
religion had been given the status of state religion, “forgot” the
“naivete” of primitive Christianity with its democratic revolutionary
spirit.

The reduction of the remuneration of high state officials seem “simply”
a demand of naive, primitive democracy. One of the “founders” of modern
opportunism, the ex-Social-Democrat Eduard Bernstein, has more than once
repeated the vulgar bourgeois jeers at “primitive” democracy. Like all
opportunists, and like the present Kautskyites, he did not understand at
all that, first of all, the transition from capitalism to socialism is
impossible without a certain “reversion” to “primitive” democracy (for
how else can the majority, and then the whole population without
exception, proceed to discharge state functions?); and that, secondly,
"primitive democracy" based on capitalism and capitalist culture is not
the same as primitive democracy in prehistoric or precapitalist times.
Capitalist culture has created large-scale production, factories,
railways, the postal service, telephones, etc., and on this basis the
great majority of the functions of the old "state power" have become so
simplified and can be reduced to such exceedingly simple operations of
registration, filing, and checking that they can be easily performed by
every literate person, can quite easily be performed for ordinary
"workmen's wages", and that these functions can (and must) be stripped
of every shadow of privilege, of every semblance of "official grandeur".

All officials, without exception, elected and subject to recall at any
time, their salaries reduced to the level of ordinary "workmen's wages"
— these simple and "self-evident" democratic measures, while completely
uniting the interests of the workers and the majority of the peasants,
at the same time serve as a bridge leading from capitalism to socialism.
These measures concern the reorganization of the state, the purely
political reorganization of society; but, of course, they acquire their
full meaning and significance only in connection with the "expropriation
of the expropriators" either bring accomplished or in preparation, i.e.,
with the transformation of capitalist private ownership of the means of
production into social ownership.

  "The Commune," Marx wrote, "made the catchword of all bourgeois
  revolutions, cheap government, a reality, by abolishing the two
  greatest sources of expenditure--the army and the officialdom."

From the peasants, as from other sections of the petty bourgeoisie, only
an insignificant few "rise to the top", "get on in the world" in the
bourgeois sense, i.e., become either well-to-do, bourgeois, or officials
in secure and privileged positions. In every capitalist country where
there are peasants (as there are in most capitalist countries), the vast
majority of them are oppressed by the government and long for its
overthrow, long for “cheap” government. This can be achieved only by the
proletariat; and by achieving it, the proletariat at the same time takes
a step towards the socialist reorganization of the state.

3. Abolition of Parliamentarism

"The Commune," Marx wrote, "was to be a working, not a parliamentary,
body, executive and legislative at the same time....

  "Instead of deciding once in three or six years which member of the
  ruling class was to represent and repress [ver- and zertreten] the
  people in parliament, universal suffrage was to serve the people
  constituted in communes, as individual suffrage serves every other
  employer in the search for workers, foremen and accountants for his
  business."

Owing to the prevalence of social-chauvinism and opportunism, this
remarkable criticism of parliamentarism, made in 1871, also belongs now
to the "forgotten words" of Marxism. The professional Cabinet Ministers
and parliamentarians, the traitors to the proletariat and the
“practical” socialists of our day, have left all criticism of
parliamentarism to the anarchists, and, on this wonderfully reasonable
ground, they denounce all criticism of parliamentarism as “anarchism”!!
It is not surprising that the proletariat of the “advanced”
parliamentary countries, disgusted with such “socialists” as the
Scheidemanns, Davids, Legiens, Sembats, Renaudels, Hendersons,
Vanderveldes, Staunings, Brantings, Bissolatis, and Co., has been with
increasing frequency giving its sympathies to anarcho-syndicalism, in
spite of the fact that the latter is merely the twin brother of
opportunism.

For Marx, however, revolutionary dialectics was never the empty
fashionable phrase, the toy rattle, which Plekhanov, Kautsky and others
have made of it. Marx knew how to break with anarchism ruthlessly for
its inability to make use even of the “pigsty” of bourgeois
parliamentarism, especially when the situation was obviously not
revolutionary; but at the same time he knew how to subject
parliamentarism to genuinely revolutionary proletarian criticism.

To decide once every few years which members of the ruling class is to
repress and crush the people through parliament--this is the real
essence of bourgeois parliamentarism, not only in parliamentary-
constitutional monarchies, but also in the most democratic republics.

But if we deal with the question of the state, and if we consider
parliamentarism as one of the institutions of the state, from the point
of view of the tasks of the proletariat in this field, what is the way
out of parliamentarism? How can it be dispensed with?

Once again, we must say: the lessons of Marx, based on the study of the
Commune, have been so completely forgotten that the present-day
"Social-Democrat" (i.e., present-day traitor to socialism) really cannot
understand any criticism of parliamentarism other than anarchist or
reactionary criticism.

The way out of parliamentarism is not, of course, the abolition of
representative institutions and the elective principle, but the
conversion of the representative institutions from talking shops into
“working” bodies. "The Commune was to be a working, not a parliamentary,
body, executive and legislative at the same time."

"A working, not a parliamentary body"--this is a blow straight from the
shoulder at the present-day parliamentarian country, from America to
Switzerland, from France to Britain, Norway and so forth--in these
countries the real business of “state” is performed behind the scenes
and is carried on by the departments, chancelleries, and General Staffs.
parliament is given up to talk for the special purpose of fooling the
"common people". This is so true that even in the Russian republic, a
bourgeois-democratic republic, all these sins of parliamentarism came
out at once, even before it managed to set up a real parliament. The
heroes of rotten philistinism, such as the skobelevs and tseretelis, the
Chernovs and Avksentyevs, have even succeeded in polluting the Soviets
after the fashion of the most disgusting bourgeois parliamentarism, in
converting them into mere talking shops. In the Soviets, the “socialist”
Ministers are fooling the credulous rustics with phrase-mongering and
resolutions. In the government itself a sort of permanent shuffle is
going on in order that, on the one hand, as many
Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks as possible may in turn get
near the “pie”, the lucrative and honorable posts, and that, on the
other hand, the “attention” of the people may be “engaged”. meanwhile
the chancelleries and army staffs “do” the business of “state”.

_Dyelo Naroda_, the organ of the ruling Socialist-Revolutionary Party,
recently admitted in a leading article--with the matchless frankness of
people of "good society", in which “all” are engaged in political
prostitution - that even in the ministeries headed by the “socialists”
(save the mark!), the whole bureaucratic apparatus is in fact unchanged,
is working in the old way and quite “freely” sabotaging revolutionary
measures! Even without this admission, does not the actual history of
the participation of the Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks in the
government prove this? It is noteworthy, however, that in the
ministerial company of the Cadets, the Chernovs, Rusanovs, Zenzinovs,
and other editors of _Dyelo Naroda_ have so completely lost all sense of
shame as to brazenly assert, as if it were a mere bagetelle, that in
“their” ministeries everything is unchanged!! Revolutionary-democratic
phrases to gull the rural Simple Simons, and bureaucracy and red tape to
"gladden the hearts" of the capitalists--that is the essence of the
“honest” coalition.

The Commune substitutes for the venal and rotten parliamentarism of
bourgeois society institutions in which freedom of opinion and
discussion does not degenerate into deception, for the parliamentarians
themselves have to work, have to execute their own laws, have themselves
to test the results achieved in reality, and to account directly to
their constituents. Representative institutions remain, but there is no
parliamentarism here as a special system, as the division of labor
between the legislative and the executive, as a privileged position for
the deputies. We cannot imagine democracy, even proletarian democracy,
without representative institutions, but we can and must imagine
democracy without parliamentarism, if criticism of bourgeois society is
not mere words for us, if the desire to overthrow the rule of the
bourgeoisie is our earnest and sincere desire, and not a mere “election”
cry for catching workers' votes, as it is with the Mensheviks and
Socialist-Revolutionaries, and also the Scheidemanns and Legiens, the
Smblats and Vanderveldes.

It is extremely instructive to note that, in speaking of the function of
those officials who are necessary for the Commune and for proletarian
democracy, Marx compares them to the workers of "every other employer",
that is, of the ordinary capitalist enterprise, with its "workers,
foremen, and accountants".

There is no trace of utopianism in Marx, in the sense that he made up or
invented a “new” society. No, he studied the birth of the new society
out of the old, and the forms of transition from the latter to the
former, as a mass proletarian movement and tried to draw practical
lessons from it. He “Learned” from the Commune, just as all the great
revolutionary thinkers learned unhesitatingly from the experience of
great movements of the oppressed classes, and never addressed them with
pedantic “homilies” (such as Plekhanov's: "They should not have taken up
arms" or Tsereteli's: "A class must limit itself").

Abolishing the bureaucracy at once, everywhere and completely, is out of
the question. It is a utopia. But to smash the old bureaucratic machine
at once and to begin immediately to construct a new one that will make
possible the gradual abolition of all bureaucracy--this is not a utopia,
it is the experience of the Commune, the direct and immediate task of
the revolutionary proletariat.

Capitalism simplifies the functions of “state” administration; it makes
it possible to cast “bossing” aside and to confine the whole matter to
the organization of the proletarians (as the ruling class), which will
hire "workers, foremen and accountants" in the name of the whole of
society.

We are not utopians, we do not “dream” of dispensing at once with all
administration, with all subordination. These anarchist dreams, based
upon incomprehension of the tasks of the proletarian dictatorship, are
totally alien to Marxism, and, as a matter of fact, serve only to
postpone the socialist revolution until people are different. No, we
want the socialist revolution with people as they are now, with people
who cannot dispense with subordination, control, and "foremen and
accountants".

The subordination, however, must be to the armed vanguard of all the
exploited and working people, i.e., to the proletariat. A beginning can
and must be made at once, overnight, to replace the specific “bossing”
of state officials by the simple functions of "foremen and accountants",
functions which are already fully within the ability of the average town
dweller and can well be performed for "workmen's wages".

We, the workers, shall organize large-scale production on the basis of
what capitalism has already created, relying on our own experience as
workers, establishing strict, iron discipline backed up by the state
power of the armed workers. We shall reduce the role of state officials
to that of simply carrying out our instructions as responsible,
revocable, modestly paid "foremen and accountants" (of course, with the
aid of technicians of all sorts, types and degrees). This is our
proletarian task, this is what we can and must start with in
accomplishing the proletarian revolution. Such a beginning, on the basis
of large-scale production, will of itself lead to the gradual "withering
away" of all bureaucracy, to the gradual creation of an order--an order
without inverted commas, an order bearing no similarity to wage
slavery--an order under which the functions of control and accounting,
becoming more and more simple, will be performed by each in turn, will
then become a habit and will finally die out as the special functions of
a special section of the population.

A witty German Social-Democrat of the seventies of the last century
called the postal service an example of the socialist economic system.
This is very true. At the present the postal service is a business
organized on the lines of state-capitalist monopoly. Imperialism is
gradually transforming all trusts into organizations of a similar type,
in which, standing over the “common” people, who are overworked and
starved, one has the same bourgeois bureaucracy. But the mechanism of
social management is here already to hand. Once we have overthrown the
capitalists, crushed the resistance of these exploiters with the iron
hand of the armed workers, and smashed the bureaucratic machinery of the
modern state, we shall have a splendidly-equipped mechanism, freed from
the “parasite”, a mechanism which can very well be set going by the
united workers themselves, who will hire technicians, foremen and
accountants, and pay them all, as indeed all “state” officials in
general, workmen's wages. Here is a concrete, practical task which can
immediately be fulfilled in relation to all trusts, a task whose
fulfilment will rid the working people of exploitation, a task which
takes account of what the Commune had already begun to practice
(particularly in building up the state).

To organize the whole economy on the lines of the postal service so that
the technicians, foremen and accountants, as well as all officials,
shall receive salaries no higher than "a workman's wage", all under the
control and leadership of the armed proletariat--that is our immediate
aim. This is what will bring about the abolition of parliamentarism and
the preservation of representative institutions. This is what will rid
the laboring classes of the bourgeoisie's prostitution of these
institutions.

4. Organisation of National Unity

  "In a brief sketch of national organization which the Commune had no
  time to develop, it states explicitly that the Commune was to be the
  political form of even the smallest village...." The communes were to
  elect the "National Delegation" in Paris.

  "... The few but important functions which would still remain for a
  central government were not to to be suppressed, as had been
  deliberately mis-stated, but were to be transferred to communal, i.e.,
  strictly responsible, officials.

  "... National unity was not to be broken, but, on the contrary,
  organized by the communal constitution; it was to become a reality by
  the destruction of state power which posed as the embodiment of that
  unity yet wanted to be independent of, and superior to, the nation, on
  whose body it was but a parasitic excrescence. While the merely
  repressive organs of the old governmental power were to be amputated,
  its legitimate functions were to be wrested from an authority claiming
  the right to stand above society, and restored to the responsible
  servants of society."

The extent to which the opportunists of present-day Social-Democracy
have failed--perhaps it would be more true to say, have refused--to
understand these observations of Marx is best shown by that book of
Herostratean fame of the renegade Bernstein, _The Premises of Socialism
and the Tasks of the Social-Democrats_. It is in connection with the
above passage from Marx that Bernstein wrote that "as far as its
political content", this programme "displays, in all its essential
features, the greatest similarity to the federalism of Proudhon.... In
spite of all the other points of difference between Marx and the
'petty-bourgeois' Proudhon [Bernstein places the word "petty-bourgeois"
in inverted commas, to make it sound ironical] on these points, their
lines of reasoning run as close as could be." Of course, Bernstein
continues, the importance of the municipalities is growing, but "it
seems doubtful to me whether the first job of democracy would be such a
dissolution [Auflosung] of the modern states and such a complete
transformation [Umwandlung] of their organization as is visualized by
Marx and Proudhon (the formation of a National Assembly from delegates
of the provincial of district assemblies, which, in their turn, would
consist of delegates from the communes), so that consequently the
previous mode of national representation would disappear." (Bernstein,
_Premises_, German edition, 1899, pp.134 and 136)

To confuse Marx's view on the "destruction of state power, a parasitic
excrescence", with Proudhon's federalism is positively monstrous! But it
is no accident, for it never occurs to the opportunist that Marx does
not speak here at all about federalism as opposed to centralism, but
about smashing the old, bourgeois state machine which exists in all
bourgeois countries.

The only thing that does occur to the opportunist is what he sees around
him, in an environment of petty-bourgeois philistinism and “reformists”
stagnation, namely, only “municipalities”! The opportunist has even
grown out of the habit of thinking about proletarian revolution.

It is ridiculous. But the remarkable thing is that nobody argued with
Bernstein on this point. Bernstein has been refuted by many, especially
by Plekhanov in Russian literature and by Kautsky in European
literature, but neither of them has said anything about this distortion
of Marx by Bernstein.

The opportunist has so much forgotten how to think in a revolutionary
way and to dwell on revolution that he attributes “federalism” to Marx,
whom he confuses with the founder of anarchism, Proudhon. As for Kautsky
and Plekhanov, who claim to be orthodox Marxists and defenders of the
theory of revolutionary Marxism, they are silent on this point! Here is
one of the roots of the extreme vulgarization of the views on the
difference between Marxism and anarchism, which is characteristic of
both the Kautskyites and the opportunists, and which we shall discuss
again later.

There is not a trace of federalism in Marx's above-quoted observation on
the experience of the Commune. Marx agreed with Proudhon on the very
point that the opportunist Bernstein did not see. Marx disagreed with
Proudhon on the very point on which Bernstein found a similarity between
them.

Marx agreed with Proudhon in that they both stood for the “smashing” of
the modern state machine. Neither the opportunists nor the Kautskyites
wish to see the similarity of views on this point between Marxism and
anarchism (both Proudhon and Bakunin) because this is where they have
departed from Marxism.

Marx disagreed both with Proudhon and Bakunin precisely on the question
of federalism (not to mention the dictatorship of the proletariat).
Federalism as a principle follows logically from the petty-bourgeois
views of anarchism. Marx was a centralist. There is no departure
whatever from centralism in his observations just quoted. Only those who
are imbued with the philistine "superstitious belief" in the state can
mistake the destruction of the bourgeois state machine for the
destruction of centralism!

Now if the proletariat and the poor peasants take state power into their
own hands, organize themselves quite freely in communes, and unite the
action of all the communes in striking at capital, in crushing the
resistance of the capitalists, and in transferring the privately-owned
railways, factories, land and so on to the entire nation, to the whole
of society, won't that be centralism? Won't that be the most consistent
democratic centralism and, moreover, proletarian centralism?

Bernstein simply cannot conceive of the possibility of voluntary
centralism, of the voluntary fusion of the proletarian communes, for the
sole purpose of destroying bourgeois rule and the bourgeois state
machine. Like all philistines, Bernstein pictures centralism as
something which can be imposed and maintained solely from above, and
solely by the bureaucracy and military clique.

As though foreseeing that his views might be distorted, Marx expressly
emphasized that the charge that the Commune had wanted to destroy
national unity, to abolish the central authority, was a deliberate
fraud. Marx purposely used the words: "National unity was... to be
organized", so as to oppose conscious, democratic, proletarian
centralism to bourgeois, military, bureaucratic centralism.

But there are none so deaf as those who will not hear. And the very
thing the opportunists of present-day Social-Democracy do not want to
hear about it the destruction of state power, the amputation of the
parasitic excrescence.

5. Abolition of the Parasite State

We have already quoted Marx's words on the subject, and we must now
supplement them.

  "It is generally the fate of new historical creations," he wrote, "to
  be mistaken for the counterpart of older and even defunct forms of
  social life, to which they may bear a certain likeness. Thus, this new
  Commune, which breaks [bricht, smashes] the modern state power, has
  been regarded as a revival of the medieval communes... as a federation
  of small states (as Montesquieu and the Girondins¹⁶ visualized it)...
  as an exaggerated form of the old struggle against
  overcentralization....

  "... The Communal Constitution would have restored to the social body
  all the forces hitherto absorbed by that parasitic excrescence, the
  'state', feeding upon and hampering the free movement of society. By
  this one act it would have initiated the regeneration of France....

  "... The Communal Constitution would have brought the rural producers
  under the intellectual lead of the central towns of their districts,
  and there secured to them, in the town working men, the natural
  trustees of their interests. The very existence of the Commune
  involved, as a matter of course, local self-government, but no longer
  as a counterpoise to state power, now become superfluous."

"Breaking state power", which as a "parasitic excrescence"; its
“amputation”, its “smashing”; "state power, now become
superfluous"--these are the expressions Marx used in regard to the state
when appraising and analyzing the experience of the Commune.

All this was written a little less than half a century ago; and now one
has to engage in excavations, as it were, in order to bring undistorted
Marxism to the knowledge of the mass of the people. The conclusions
drawn from the observation of the last great revolution which Marx lived
through were forgotten just when the time for the next great proletarian
revolution has arrived.

  "... The multiplicity of interpretations to which the Commune has been
  subjected, and the multiplicity of interests which expressed
  themselves in it show that it was a thoroughly flexible political
  form, while all previous forms of government had been essentially
  repressive. Its true secret was this: it was essentially a
  working-class government, the result of the struggle of the producing
  against the appropriating class, the political form at last discovered
  under which the economic emancipation of labor could be
  accomplished....

  "Except on this last condition, the Communal Constitution would have
  been an impossibility and a delusion...."

The utopians busied themselves with “discovering” political forms under
which the socialist transformation of society was to take place. The
anarchists dismissed the question of political forms altogether. The
opportunists of present-day Social-Democracy accepted the bourgeois
political forms of the parliamentary democratic state as the limit which
should not be overstepped; they battered their foreheads praying before
this “model”, and denounced as anarchism every desire to break these
forms.

Marx deduced from the whole history of socialism and the political
struggle that the state was bound to disappear, and that the
transitional form of its disappearance (the transition from state to
non-state) would be the "proletariat organized as the ruling class".
Marx, however, did not set out to discover the political forms of this
future stage. He limited himself to carefully observing French history,
to analyzing it, and to drawing the conclusion to which the year 1851
had led, namely, that matters were moving towards destruction of the
bourgeois state machine.

And when the mass revolutionary movement of the proletariat burst forth,
Marx, in spite of its failure, in spite of its short life and patent
weakness, began to study the forms it had discovered.

The Commune is the form "at last discovered" by the proletarian
revolution, under which the economic emancipation of labor can take
place.

The Commune is the first attempt by a proletarian revolution to smash
the bourgeois state machine; and it is the political form "at last
discovered", by which the smashed state machine can and must be
replaced.

We shall see further on that the Russian revolutions of 1905 and 1917,
in different circumstances and under different conditions, continue the
work of the Commune and confirm Marx's brilliant historical analysis.


Chapter IV: Supplementary Explanations by Engels

Marx gave the fundamentals concerning the significance of the experience
of the Commune. Engels returned to the same subject time and again, and
explained Marx's analysis and conclusions, sometimes elucidating other
aspects of the question with such power and vividness that it is
necessary to deal with his explanations specially.

1. The Housing Question

In his work, The Housing Question (1872), Engels already took into
account the experience of the Commune, and dealt several times with the
tasks of the revolution in relation to the state. It is interesting to
note that the treatment of this specific subject clearly revealed, on
the one hand, points of similarity between the proletarian state and the
present state--points that warrant speaking of the state in both
cases--and, on the other hand, points of difference between them, or the
transition to the destruction of the state.

  "How is the housing question to be settled then? In present-day
  society, it is settled just as any other social question: by the
  gradual economic levelling of demand and supply, a settlement which
  reproduces the question itself again and again and therefore is no
  settlement. How a social revolution would settle this question not
  only depends on the circumstances in each particular case, but is also
  connected with much more far-reaching questions, one of the most
  fundamental of which is the abolition of the antithesis between town
  and country. As it is not our task to create utopian systems for the
  organization of the future society, it would be more than idle to go
  into the question here. But one thing is certain: there is already a
  sufficient quantity of houses in the big cities to remedy immediately
  all real 'housing shortage', provided they are used judiciously. This
  can naturally only occur through the expropriation of the present
  owners and by quartering in their houses homeless workers or workers
  overcrowded in their present homes. As soon as the proletariat has won
  political power, such a measure prompted by concern for the common
  good will be just as easy to carry out as are other expropriations and
  billetings by the present-day state." (German edition, 1887, p. 22)¹⁷

The change in the form of state power is not examined here, but only the
content of its activity. Expropriations and billetings take place by
order even of the present state. From the formal point of view, the
proletarian state will also “order” the occupation of dwellings and
expropriation of houses. But it is clear that the old executive
apparatus, the bureaucracy, which is connected with the bourgeoisie,
would simply be unfit to carry out the orders of the proletarian state.

  "... It must be pointed out that the 'actual seizure' of all the
  instruments of labor, the taking possession of industry as a whole by
  the working people, is the exact opposite of the Proudhonist
  'redemption'. In the latter case the individual worker becomes the
  owner of the dwelling, the peasant farm, the instruments of labor; in
  the former case, the 'working people' remain the collective owners of
  the houses, factories and instruments of labor, and will hardly permit
  their use, at least during a transitional period, by individuals or
  associations without compensation for the cost. In the same way, the
  abolition of property in land is not the abolition of ground rent but
  its transfer, if in a modified form, to society. The actual seizure of
  all the instruments of labor by the working people, therefore, does
  not at all preclude the retention of rent relations." (p.68)

We shall examine the question touched upon in this passage, namely, the
economic basis for the withering away of the state, in the next chapter.
Engels expresses himself most cautiously. saying that the proletarian
state would “hardly” permit the use of houses without payment, "at least
during a transitional period". The letting of houses owed by the whole
people to individual families presupposes the collection of rent, a
certain amount of control, nd the employment of some standard in
allotting the housing. All this calls for a certain form of state, but
it does not at all call for a special military bureaucratic apparatus,
with officials occupying especially privileged positions. The transition
to a situation in which it will be possible to supply dwellings
rent-free depends on the complete "withering away" of the state.

Speaking of the Blanquists' adoption of the fundamental position of
Marxism after the Commune and under the influence of its experience,
Engels, in passing, formulates this position as follows:

  "... Necessity of political action by the proletariat and of its
  dictatorship as the transition to the abolition of classes and, with
  them, of the state...." (p.55)

Addicts of hair-splitting criticism, or bourgeois "exterminators of
Marxism", will perhaps see a contradiction between this recognition of
the "abolition of the state" and repudiation of this formula as an
anarchist one in the above passage from Anti-Dühring. It would not be
surprising if the opportunists classed Engels, too, as an “anarchist”,
for it is becoming increasingly common with the social-chauvinists to
accuse the internationalists of anarchism.

Marxism has always taught that with the abolition of classes the state
will also be abolished. The well-known passage on the "withering away of
the state in _Anti-Dühring_ accuses the anarchists not simply of
favoring the abolition of the state, but of preaching that the state can
be abolished “overnight”.

As the now prevailing "Social-Democratic" doctrine completely distorts
the relation of Marxism to anarchism on the question of the abolition of
the state, it will be particularly useful to recall a certain
controversy in which Marx and Engels came out against the anarchists.

Controversy with the Anarchists

This controversy took place in 1873. Marx and Engels contributed
articles against the Proudhonists, “autonomists” or "anti-
authoritarians", to an Italian socialist annual, and it was not until
1913 that these articles appeared in German in Neue Zeit¹⁸.

  "If the political struggle of the working class assumes revolutionary
  form," wrote Marx, ridiculing the anarchists for their repudiation of
  politics, "and if the workers set up their revolutionary dictatorship
  in place of the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, they commit the
  terrible crime of violating principles, for in order to satisfy their
  wretched, vulgar everyday needs and to crush the resistance of the
  bourgeoisie, they give the state a revolutionary and transient form,
  instead of laying down their arms and abolishing the state." (Neue
  Zeit Vol.XXXII, 1, 1913-14, p.40)

It was solely against this kind of “abolition” of the state that Marx
fought in refuting the anarchists! He did not at all oppose the view
that the state would disappear when classes disappeared, or that it
would be abolished when classes were abolished. What he did oppose was
the proposition that the workers should renounce the use of arms,
organized violence, that is, the state, which is to serve to "crush the
resistance of the bourgeoisie".

To prevent the true meaning of his struggle against anarchism from being
distorted, Marx expressly emphasized the "revolutionary and transient
form" of the state which the proletariat needs. The proletariat needs
the state only temporarily. We do not after all differ with the
anarchists on the question of the abolition of the state as the aim. We
maintain that, to achieve this aim, we must temporarily make use of the
instruments, resources, and methods of state power against the
exploiters, just as the temporary dictatorship of the oppressed class is
necessary for the abolition of classes. Marx chooses the sharpest and
clearest way of stating his case against the anarchists: After
overthrowing the yoke of the capitalists, should the workers "lay down
their arms", or use them against the capitalists in order to crush their
resistance? But what is the systematic use of arms by ne class against
another if not a "transient form" of state?

Let every Social-Democrat ask himself: Is that how he has been posing
the question of the state in controversy with the anarchists? Is that
how it has been posed by the vast majority of the official socialist
parties of the Second International?

Engels expounds the same ideas in much greater detail and still more
popularly. First of all he ridicules the muddled ideas of the
Proudhonists, who call themselves "anti-authoritarians", i.e.,
repudiated all authority, all subordination, all power. Take a factory,
a railway, a ship on the high seas, said Engels: is it not clear that
not one of these complex technical establishments, based on the use of
machinery and the systematic co-operation of many people, could function
without a certain amount of subordination and, consequently, without a
certain amount of authority or power?

  "... When I counter the most rabid anti-authoritarians with these
  arguments, they only answer they can give me is the following: Oh,
  that's true, except that here it is not a question of authority with
  which we vest our delegates, but of a commission! These people imagine
  they can change a thing by changing its name...."

Having thus shown that authority and autonomy are relative terms, that
the sphere of their application varies with the various phases of social
development, that it is absurd to take them as absolutes, and adding
that the sphere of application of machinery and large-scale production
is steadily expanding, Engels passes from the general discussion of
authority to the question of the state.

  "Had the autonomists," he wrote, "contented themselves with saying
  that the social organization of the future would allow authority only
  within the bounds which the conditions of production make inevitable,
  one could have come to terms with them. But they are blind to all
  facts that make authority necessary and they passionately fight the
  word.

  "Why do the anti-authoritarians not confine themselves to crying out
  against political authority, the state? All socialists are agreed that
  the state, and with it political authority, will disappear as a result
  of the coming social revolution, that is, that public functions will
  lose their political character and become mere administrative
  functions of watching over social interests. But the
  anti-authoritarians demand that the political state be abolished at
  one stroke, even before the social relations that gave both to it have
  been destroyed. They demand that the first act of the social
  revolution shall be the abolition of authority.

  "Have these gentlemen ever seen a revolution? A revolution is
  certainly the most authoritarian thing there is; it is an act whereby
  one part of the population imposes its will upon the other part by
  means of rifles, bayonets and cannon, all of which are highly
  authoritarian means. And the victorious party must maintain its rule
  by means of the terror which its arms inspire in the reactionaries.
  Would the Paris Commune have lasted more than a day if it had not used
  the authority of the armed people against the bourgeoisie? Cannot we,
  on the contrary, blame it for having made too little use of that
  authority? Therefore, one of two things: either that
  anti-authoritarians down't know what they are talking about, in which
  case they are creating nothing but confusion. Or they do know, and in
  that case they are betraying the cause of the proletariat. In either
  case they serve only reaction." (p.39)

This argument touches upon questions which should be examined in
connection with the relationship between politics and economics during
the withering away of the state (the next chapter is devoted to this).
These questions are: the transformation of public functions from
political into simple functions of administration, and the "political
state". This last term, one particularly liable to misunderstanding,
indicates the process of the withering away of the state: at a certain
stage of this process, the state which is withering away may be called a
non-political state.

Against, the most remarkable thing in this argument of Engels' is the
way he states his case against the anarchists. Social-Democrats,
claiming to be disciples of Engels, have argued on this subject against
the anarchists millions of times since 1873, but they have not argued as
Marxists could and should. The anarchist idea of abolition of the state
is muddled and non-revolutionary--that is how Engels put it. It is
precisely the revolution in its rise and development, with its specific
tasks in relation to violence, authority, power, the state, that the
anarchists refuse to see.

The usual criticism of anarchism by present-day Social-Democrats has
boiled down to the purest philistine banality: "We recognize the state,
whereas the anarchists do not!" Naturally, such banality cannot but
repel workers who are at all capable of thinking and
revolutionary-minded. What Engels says is different. He stresses that
all socialists recognize that the state will disappear as a result of
the socialist revolution. He then deals specifically with the question
of the revolution - the very question which, as a rule, the
Social-Democrats evade out of opportunism, leaving it, so to speak,
exclusively for the anarchists "to work out". And when dealing with this
question, Engels takes the bull by the horns; he asks: should not the
Commune have made more use of the revolutionary power of the state, that
is, of the proletariat armed and organized as the ruling class?

Prevailing official Social-Democracy usually dismissed the question of
the concrete tasks of the proletariat in the revolution either with a
philistine sneer, or, at best, with the sophistic evasion: "The future
will show". And the anarchists were justified in saying about such
Social-Democrats that they were failing in their task of giving the
workers a revolutionary education. Engels draws upon the experience of
the last proletarian revolution precisely for the purpose of making a
most concrete study of what should be done by the proletariat, and in
what manner, in relation to both the banks and the state.

Letter to Bebel

One of the most, if not the most, remarkable observation on the state in
the works of Marx and Engels is contained in the following passage in
Engels' letter to Bebel dated March 18-28, 1875. This letter, we may
observe in parenthesis, was, as far as we know, first published by Bebel
in the second volume of his memoirs (_Aus meinem Leben_), which appeared
in 1911, i.e., 36 years after the letter had been written and sent.

Engels wrote to Bebel criticizing the same draft of the Gotha Programme
which Marx criticized in his famous letter to Bracke. Referring
specially to the question of the state, Engels said:

  "The free people's state has been transferred into the free state.
  Taken in its grammatical sense, a free state is one where the state is
  free in relation to its citizens, hence a state with a despotic
  government. The whole talk about the state should be dropped,
  especially since the Commune, which was no longer a state in the
  proper sense of the word. The 'people's state' has been thrown in our
  faces by the anarchists to the point of disgust, although already
  Marx's book against Proudhon and later the _Communist Manifesto_ say
  plainly that with the introduction of the socialist order of society
  the state dissolves of itself [sich auflost] and disappears. As the
  state is only a transitional institution which is used in the
  struggle, in the revolution, to hold down one's adversaries by force,
  it is sheer nonsense to talk of a 'free people's state'; so long as
  the proletariat still needs the state, it does not need it in the
  interests of freedom but in order to hold down its adversaries, and as
  soon as it becomes possible to speak of freedom the state as such
  ceases to exist. We would therefore propose replacing the state
  everywhere by Gemeinwesen, a good old German word which can very well
  take the place of the French word commune." (pp.321-22 of the German
  original.)¹⁹

It should be borne in mind that this letter refers to the party
programme which Marx criticized in a letter dated only a few weeks later
than the above (Marx's letter is dated May 5, 1875), and that at the
time Engels was living with Marx in London. Consequently, when he says
“we” in the last sentence, Engels undoubtedly, in his own as well as in
Marx's name, suggests to the leader of the German workers' party that
the word “state” be struck out of the programme and replaced by the word
“community”.

What a howl about “anarchism” would be raised by the leading lights of
present-day “Marxism”, which has been falsified for the convenience of
the opportunists, if such an amendment of the programme were suggested
to them!

Let them howl. This will earn them the praises of the bourgeoisie.

And we shall go on with our work. In revising the programme of our
Party, we must by all means take the advice of Engels and Marx into
consideration in order to come nearer the truth, to restore Marxism by
ridding it of distortions, to guide the struggle of the working class
for its emancipation more correctly. Certainly no one opposed to the
advice of Engels and Marx will be found among the Bolsheviks. The only
difficulty that may perhaps arise will be in regard to the term. In
German there are two words meaning “community”, of which Engels used the
one which does not denote a single community, but their totality, a
system of communities. In Russian there is no such word, and we may have
to choose the French word “commune”, although this also has its
drawbacks.

"The Commune was no longer a state in the proper sense of the
word"--this is the most theoretically important statement Engels makes.
After what has been said above, this statement is perfectly clear. The
Commune was ceasing to be a state since it had to suppress, not the
majority of the population, but a minority (the exploiters). It had
smashed the bourgeois state machine. In place of a special coercive
force the population itself came on the scene. All this was a departure
from the state in the proper sense of the word. And had the Commune
become firmly established, all traces of the state in it would have
"withered away" of themselves; it would not have had to “abolish” the
institutions of the state--they would have ceased to function as they
ceased to have anything to do.

"The 'people's state' has been thrown in our faces by the anarchists".
In saying this, Engels above all has in mind Bakunin and his attacks on
the German Social-Democrats. Engels admits that these attacks were
justified insofar as the "people's state" was as much an absurdity and
as much a departure from socialism as the "free people's state". Engels
tried to put the struggle of the German Social-Democrats against the
anarchists on the right lines, to make this struggle correct in
principle, to ride it of opportunist prejudices concerning the “state”.
Unfortunately, Engels' letter was pigeon-holed for 36 years. We shall
see farther on that, even after this letter was published, Kautsky
persisted in virtually the same mistakes against which Engels had
warned.

Bebel replied to Engels in a letter dated September 21, 1875, in which
he wrote, among other things, that he "fully agreed" with Engels'
opinion of the draft programme, and that he had reproached Liebknecht
with readiness to make concessions (p.334 of the German edition of
Bebel's memoirs, Vol.II). But if we take Bebel's pamphlet, _Our Aims_,
we find there views on the state that are absolutely wrong.

  "The state must... be transformed from one based on class rule into a
  people's state." (_Unsere Ziele_, 1886, p.14)

This was printed in the ninth (ninth!) edition of Bebel's pamphlet! It
is not surprising that opportunist views on the state, so persistently
repeated, were absorbed by the German Social-Democrats, especially as
Engels' revolutionary interpretations had been safely pigeon-holed, and
all the conditions of life were such as to “wean” them from revolution
for a long time.

2. Criticism of the Draft of the Erfurt Programme

In analyzing Marxist teachings on the state, the criticism of the draft
of the Erfurt Programme,²⁰ sent by Engels to Kautsky on June 29, 1891,
and published only 10 years later in Neue Zeit, cannot be ignored; for
it is with the opportunist views of the Social-Democrats on questions of
state organization that this criticism is mainly concerned.

We shall note in passing that Engels also makes an exceedingly valuable
observation on economic questions, which shows how attentively and
thoughtfully he watched the various changes occurring in modern
capitalism, and how for this reason he was able to foresee to a certain
extent the tasks of our present, the imperialist, epoch. Here is that
observation: referring to the word “planlessness” (Planlosigkeit), used
in the draft programme, as characteristic of capitalism, Engels wrote:

  "When we pass from joint-stock companies to trusts which assume
  control over, and monopolize, whole industries, it is not only private
  production that ceases, but also planlessness." (_Neue Zeit_, Vol. XX,
  1, 1901-02, p.8)

Here was have what is most essential in the theoretical appraisal of the
latest phase of capitalism, i.e., imperialism, namely, that capitalism
becomes monopoly capitalism. The latter must be emphasized because the
erroneous bourgeois reformist assertion that monopoly capitalism or
state-monopoly capitalism is no longer capitalism, but can now be called
"state socialism" and so on, is very common. The trusts, of course,
never provided, do not now provide, and cannot provide complete
planning. But however much they do plan, however much the capitalist
magnates calculate in advance the volume of production on a national and
even on an international scale, and however much they systematically
regulate it, we still remain under capitalism--at its new stage, it is
true, but still capitalism, without a doubt. The “proximity” of such
capitalism to socialism should serve genuine representatives of the
proletariat as an argument proving the proximity, facility, feasibility,
and urgency of the socialist revolution, and not at all as an argument
for tolerating the repudiation of such a revolution and the efforts to
make capitalism look more attractive, something which all reformists are
trying to do.

But to return to the question of the state. In his letter Engels makes
three particularly valuable suggestions: first, in regard to the
republic; second, in regard to the connection between the national
question and state organization; and, third, in regard to local
self-government.

In regard to the republic, Engels made this the focal point of this
criticism of the draft of the Erfurt Programme. And when we recall the
importance which the Erfurt Programme acquired for all the Social-
Democrats of the world, and that it became the model for the whole
Second International, we may say without exaggeration that Engels
thereby criticizes the opportunism of the whole Second International.

"The political demands of the draft," engels wrote, "have one great
fault. It _lacks_ [Engels' italics] precisely what should have been
said."

And, later on, he makes it clear that the German Constitution is,
strictly speaking, a copy of the extremely reactionary Constitution of
1850, that the Reichstag is only, as Wilhelm Liebknecht put it, "the fig
leaf of absolutism" and that to wish "to transform all the instruments
of labor into common property" on the basis of a constitution which
legalizes the existence of petty states and the federation of petty
German states is an "obvious absurdity".

  "To touch on that is dangerous, however," Engels added, knowing only
  too well that it was impossible legally to include in the programme
  the demand for a republic in Germany. But he refused to merely accept
  this obvious consideration which satisfied “everybody”. He continued:
  "Nevertheless, somehow or other, the thing has to be attacked. How
  necessary this is is shown precisely at the present time by
  opportunism, which is gaining ground [einreissende] in a large section
  of the Social-Democrat press. Fearing a renewal of the Anti-Socialist
  Law,²¹ or recalling all manner of overhasty pronouncements made during
  the reign of that law, they now want the Party to find the present
  legal order in Germany adequate for putting through all Party demands
  by peaceful means...."

Engels particularly stressed the fundamental fact that the German
Social-Democrats were prompted by fear of a renewal of the Anti-
Socialist Law, and explicitly described it as opportunism; he declared
that precisely because there was no republic and no freedom in Germany,
the dreams of a “peaceful” path were perfectly absurd. Engels was
careful not to tie his hands. He admitted that in republican or very
free countries "one can conceive" (only “conceive”!) of a peaceful
development towards socialism, but in Germany, he repeated,

  "... in Germany, where the government is almost omnipotent and the
  Reichstag and all other representative bodies have no real power, to
  advocate such a thing in Germany, where, moreover, there is no need to
  do so, means removing the fig leaf from absolutism and becoming
  oneself a screen for its nakedness."

The great majority of the official leaders of the German Social-
Democratic Party, which pigeon-holed this advice, have really proved to
be a screen for absolutism.

  "... In the long run such a policy can only lead one's own party
  astray. They push general, abstract political questions into the
  foreground, thereby concealing the immediate concrete questions, which
  at the moment of the first great events, the first political crisis,
  automatically pose themselves. What can result from this except that
  at the decisive moment the party suddenly proves helpless and that
  uncertainty and discord on the most decisive issues reign in it
  because these issues have never been discussed? ...

  "This forgetting of the great, the principal considerations for the
  momentary interests of the day, this struggling and striving for the
  success of the moment regardless of later consequences, this sacrifice
  of the future of the movement for its present may be 'honestly' meant,
  but it is and remains opportunism, and 'honest' opportunism is perhaps
  the most dangerous of all....

  "If one thing is certain it is that our party and the working class
  can only come to power in the form of the democratic republic. This is
  even the specific form for the dictatorship of the proletariat, as the
  Great French Revolution has already shown...."

Engels realized here in a particularly striking form the fundamental
idea which runs through all of Marx's works, namely, that the democratic
republic is the nearest approach to the dictatorship of the proletariat.
For such a republic, without in the least abolishing the rule of
capital, and, therefore, the oppression of the masses nd the class
struggle, inevitably leads to such an extension, development, unfolding,
and intensification of this struggle that, as soon as it becomes
possible to meet the fundamental interests of the oppressed masses, this
possibility is realized inevitably and solely through the dictatorship
of the proletariat, through the leadership of those masses by the
proletariat. These, too, are "forgotten words" of marxism for the whole
of the Second International, and the fact that they have been forgotten
was demonstrated with particular vividness by the history of the
Menshevik Party during the first six months of the Russian revolution of
1917.

On the subject of a federal republic, in connection with the national
composition of the population, Engels wrote:

  "What should take the place of the present-day Germany [with its
  reactionary monarchical Constitution and its equally reactionary
  division into petty states, a division which perpetuates all the
  specific features of “Prussianism” instead of dissolving them in
  Germany as a whole]? In my view, the proletariat can only use the form
  of the one and indivisible republic. In the gigantic territory of the
  United States, a federal republic is still, on the whole, a necessity,
  although in the Eastern states it is already becoming a hindrance. It
  would be a step forward in Britain where the two islands are peopled
  by four nations and in spite of a single Parliament three different
  systems of legislation already exist side by side. In little
  Switzerland, it has long been a hindrance, tolerable only because
  Switzerland is content to be a purely passive member of the European
  state system. For Germany, federalization on the Swiss model would be
  an enormous step backward. Two points distinguish a union state from a
  completely unified state: first, that each member state, each canton,
  has its own civil and criminal legislative and judicial system, and,
  second, that alongside a popular chamber there is also a federal
  chamber in which each canton, whether large or small, votes as such."
  In Germany, the union state is the transition to the completely
  unified state, and the "revolution from above" of 1866 and 1870 must
  not be reversed but supplemented by a "movement from below".

Far from being indifferent to the forms of state, Engels, on the
contrary, tried to analyze the transitional forms with the utmost
thoroughness in order to establish, in accordance with the concrete
historical peculiarities of each particular case, from what and to what
the given transitional form is passing.

Approaching the matter from the standpoint of the proletariat and the
proletarian revolution, Engels, like Marx, upheld democratic centralism,
the republic--one and indivisible. He regarded the federal republic
either as an exception and a hindrance to development, or as a
transition from a monarchy to a centralized republic, as a "step
forward" under certain special conditions. And among these special
conditions, he puts the national question to the fore.

Although mercilessly criticizing the reactionary nature of small states,
and the screening of this by the national question in certain concrete
cases, Engels, like Marx, never betrayed the slightest desire to brush
aside the national question--a desire of which the Dutch and Polish
Marxists, who proceed from their perfectly justified opposition to the
narrow philistine nationalism of “their” little states, are often
guilty.

Even in regard to britain, where geographical conditions, a common
language and the history of many centuries would seem to have "put an
end" to the national question in the various small divisions of the
country--even in regard to to that country, Engels reckoned with the
plain fact that the national question was not yet a thing of the past,
and recognized in consequence that the establishment of a federal
republic would be a "step forward". Of course, there is not the
slightest hint here of Engels abandoning the criticism of the
shortcomings of a federal republic or renouncing the most determined
advocacy of, and struggle for, a unified and centralized democratic
republic.

But Engels did not at all men democratic centralism in the bureaucratic
sense in which the term is used by bourgeois and petty-bourgeois
ideologists, the anarchists among the latter. His idea of centralism did
not in the least preclude such broad local self-government as would
combine the voluntary defence of the unity of the state by the
“communes” and districts, and the complete elimination of all
bureaucratic practices and all “ordering” from above. Carrying forward
the programme views of Marxism on the state, Engels wrote:

  "So, then, a unified republic--but not in the sense of the present
  French Republic, which is nothing but the Empire established in 1798
  without the Emperor. From 1792 to 1798 each French department, each
  commune [Gemeinde], enjoyed complete self-government on the American
  model, and this is what we too must have. How self-government is to be
  organized and how we can manage, without a bureaucracy has been shown
  to us by America and the first French Republic, and is being shown
  even today by Australia, Canada and the other English colonies. And a
  provincial [regional] and communal self-government of this type is far
  freer than, for instance, Swiss federalism, under which, it is true,
  the canton is very independent in relation to the Bund [i.e., the
  federated state as a whole], but is also independent in relation to
  the district [Bezirk] and the commune. The cantonal governments
  appoint the district governors [Bezirksstatthalter] and
  prefects--which is unknown in English-speaking countries and which we
  want to abolish here as resolutely in the future as the Prussian
  Landrate and Regierungsrate" (commissioners, district police chiefs,
  governors, and in general all officials appointed from above).
  Accordingly, Engels proposes the following words for the
  self-government clause in the programme: "Complete self-government for
  the provinces [gubernias or regions], districts and communes through
  officials elected by universal suffrage. The abolition of all local
  and provincial authorities appointed by the state."

I have already had occassion to point out--in _Pravda_ (No.68, May 28,
1917), which was suppressed by the government of Kerensky and other
“socialist” Ministers--how on this point (of course, not on this point
alone by any mens) our pseudo-socialist representatives of pseudo-
revolutionary pseudo-democracy have made glaring departures from
democracy. Naturally, people who have bound themselves by a “coalition”
to the imperialist bourgeoisie have remained deaf to this criticism.

It is extremely important to note that Engels, armed with facts,
disproved by a most precise example the prejudice which is very
widespread, particularly among petty-bourgeois democrats, that a federal
republic necessarily means a greater amount of freedom than a
centralized republic. This is wrong. It is disproved by the facts cited
by Engels regarding the centralized French Republic of 792-98 and the
federal Swiss Republic. The really democratic centralized republic gave
more freedom that the federal republic. In other words, the greatest
amount of local, regional, and other freedom known in history was
accorded by a centralized and not a federal republic.

Insufficient attention has been and is being paid in our Party
propaganda and agitation to this fact, as, indeed, to the whole question
of the federal and the centralized republic and local self-government.

The 1891 Preface to Marx's "The Civil War in France"

In his preface to the third edition of _The Civil War in France_ (this
preface is dated March 18, 1891, and was originally published in _Neue
Zeit_), Engels, in addition to some interesting incidental remarks on
questions concerning the attitude towards the state, gave a remarkably
vivid summary of the lessons of the Commune.²² This summary, made more
profound by the entire experience of the 20 years that separated the
author from the Commune, and directed expressly against the
"superstitious belief in the state" so widespread in Germany, may justly
be called the last word of Marxism on the question under consideration.

  In France, Engels observed, the workers emerged with arms from every
  revolution: "therefore the disarming of the workers was the first
  commandment for the bourgeois, who were at the helm of the state.
  Hence, after every revolution won by the workers, a new struggle,
  ending with the defeat of the workers."

This summary of the experience of bourgeois revolutions is as concise as
it is expressive. The essence of the matter--among other things, on the
question of the state (has the oppressed class arms?)--is here
remarkably well-grasped. It is precisely this essence that is most often
evaded by both professors influenced by bourgeois ideology, and by
petty-bourgeois democrats. In the Russian revolution of 1917, the honor
(Cavaignac honor) of blabbing this secret of bourgeois revolutions fell
to the Menshevik, would-be Marxist, Tsereteli. In his “historic” speech
of June 11, Tsereteli blurted out that the bourgeoisie were determined
to disarm the Petrograd workers--presenting, of course, this decision as
his own, and as a necessity for the “state” in general!

Tsereteli's historical speech of June 11 will, of course, serve every
historian of the revolution of 1917 as a graphic illustration of how the
Social-Revolutionary and Menshevik bloc, led by Mr. Tsereteli, deserted
to the bourgeoisie against the revolutionary proletariat.

Another incidental remark of Engels', also connected with the question
of the state, deals with religion. It is well-known that the German
Social-Democrats, as they degenerated and became increasingly
opportunist, slipped more and more frequently into the philistine
misinterpretation of the celebrated formula: "Religion is to be declared
a private matter." That is, the formula was twisted to mean that
religion was a private matter even for the party of the revolutionary
proletariat!! It was against this complete betrayal of the revolutionary
programme of the proletariat that Engels vigorously protested. In 1891
he saw only the very feeble beginnings of opportunism in his party, and,
therefore, he expressed himself with extreme caution:

  "As almost only workers, or recognized representatives of the workers,
  sat in the Commune, its decisions bore a decidedly proletarian
  character. Either they decreed reforms which the republican
  bourgeoisie had failed to pass solely out of cowardice, but which
  provided a necessary basis for the free activity of the working
  class--such as the realization of the principle that _in relation to
  the state_ religion is a purely private matter--or the Commune
  promulgated decrees which were in the direct interest of the working
  class and in part cut deeply into the old order of society."

Engels deliberately emphasized the words "in relation to the state" as a
straight thrust at at German opportunism, which had declared religion to
be a private matter in relation to the party, thus degrading the party
of the revolutionary proletariat to the level of the most vulgar "free-
thinking" philistinism, which is prepared to allow a non-denominational
status, but which renounces the party struggle against the opium of
religion which stupifies the people.

The future historian of the German Social-Democrats, in tracing the
roots of their shameful bankruptcy in 1914, will find a fair amount of
interesting material on this question, beginning with the evasive
declarations in the articles of the party's ideological leader, Kautsky,
which throw the door wide open to opportunism, and ending with the
attitude of the party towards the "Los-von-Kirche-Bewegung²³" (the
"Leave-the-Church" movement) in 1913.

But let us see how, 20 years after the Commune, Engels summed up its
lessons for the fighting proletariat.

Here are the lessons to which Engels attached prime importance:

  "... It was precisely the oppressing power of the former centralized
  government, army, political parties, bureaucracy, which Napoleon had
  created in 1798 and which every new government had since then taken
  over as a welcome instrument and used against its opponents--it was
  this power which was to fall everywhere, just as it had fallen in
  Paris.

  "From the very outset the Commune had to recognize that the working
  class, once in power, could not go on managing with the old state
  machine; that in order not to lose again its only just-gained
  supremacy, this working class must, on the one hand, do away with all
  the old machinery of oppression previously used against it itself,
  and, on the other, safeguard itself against its own deputies and
  officials, by declaring them all, without exception, subject to recall
  at any time...."

Engels emphasized once again that not only under a monarchy, but also
under a democratic republic the state remains a state, i.e., it retains
its fundamental distinguishing feature of transforming the officials,
the 'servants of society", its organs, into the masters of society.

  "Against this transformation of the state and the organs of the state
  from servants of society into masters of society--an inevitable
  transformation in all previous states--the Commune used two infallible
  means. In the first place, it filled all posts--administrative,
  judicial, and educational--by election on the basis of universal
  suffrage of all concerned, subject to recall at any time by the
  electors. And, in the second place, it paid all officials, high or
  low, only the wages received by other workers. The highest salary paid
  by the Commune to anyone was 6,000 francs. In this way a dependable
  barrier to place-hunting and careerism was set up, even apart from the
  binding mandates to delegates to representative bodies, which were
  added besides...."

Engels here approached the interesting boundary line at which consistent
democracy, on the one hand, is transformed into socialism and, on the
other, demands socialism. For, in order to abolish the state, it is
necessary to convert the functions of the civil service into the simple
operations of control and accounting that are within the scope and
ability of the vast majority of the population, and, subsequently, of
every single individual. And if careerism is to be abolished completely,
it must be made impossible for “honorable” though profitless posts in
the Civil Service to be used as a springboard to highly lucrative posts
in banks or joint-stock companies, as constantly happens in all the
freest capitalist countries.

Engels, however, did not make the mistake some Marxists make in dealing,
for example, with the question of the right of nations to self-
determination, when they argue that is is impossible under capitalism
and will be superfluous under socialism. This seemingly clever but
actually incorrect statement might be made in regard to any democratic
institution, including moderate salaries for officials, because fully
consistent democracy is impossible under capitalism, and under socialism
all democracy will wither away.

This is a sophism like the old joke about a man becoming bald by losing
one more hair.

To develop democracy to the utmost, to find the forms for this
development, to test them by practice, and so fort--all this is one of
the component tasks of the struggle for the social revolution. Taken
separately, no kind of democracy will bring socialism. But in actual
life democracy will never be "taken separately"; it will be "taken
together" with other things, it will exert its influence on economic
life as well, will stimulate its transformation; and in its turn it will
be influenced by economic development, and so on. This is the dialectics
of living history.

Engels continued:

  "... This shattering [Sprengung] of the former state power and its
  replacement by a new and truly democratic one is described in detail
  in the third section of The Civil War. But it was necessary to touch
  briefly here once more on some of its features, because in Germany
  particularly the superstitious belief in the state has passed from
  philosophy into the general consciousness of the bourgeoisie and even
  of many workers. According to the philosophical conception, the state
  is the 'realization of the idea', or the Kingdom of God on earth,
  translated into philosophical terms, the sphere in which eternal truth
  and justice are, or should be, realized. And from this follows a
  superstitious reverence for the state and everything connected with
  it, which takes root the more readily since people are accustomed from
  childhood to imagine that the affairs and interests common to the
  whole of society could not be looked after other than as they have
  been looked after in the past, that is, through the state and its
  lucratively positioned officials. And people think they have taken
  quite an extraordinary bold step forward when they have rid themselves
  of belief in hereditary monarchy and swear by the democratic republic.
  In reality, however, the state is nothing but a machine for the
  oppression of one class by another, and indeed in the democratic
  republic no less than in the monarchy. And at best it is an evil
  inherited by the proletariat after its victorious struggle for class
  supremacy, whose worst sides the victorious proletariat will have to
  lop off as speedily as possible, just as the Commune had to, until a
  generation reared in new, free social conditions is able to discard
  the entire lumber of the state."

Engels warned the Germans not to forget the principles of socialism with
regard to the state in general in connection with the substitution of a
republic for the monarchy. His warnings now read like a veritable lesson
to the Tseretelis and Chernovs, who in their “coalition” practice have
revealed a superstitious belief in, and a superstitious reverence for,
the state!

Two more remarks. 1. Engels' statement that in a democratic republic,
"no less" than in a monarchy, the state remains a "machine for the
oppression of one class by another" by no means signifies that the form
of oppression makes no difference to the proletariat, as some anarchists
“teach”. A wider, freer and more open form of the class struggle and of
class oppression vastly assists the proletariat in its struggle for the
abolition of classes in general.

2. Why will only a new generation be able to discard the entire lumber
of the state? This question is bound up with that of overcoming
democracy, with which we shall deal now.

Engels on the Overcoming of Democracy

Engels came to express his views on this subject when establishing that
the term "Social-Democrat" was scientifically wrong.

In a preface to an edition of his articles of the seventies on various
subjects, mostly on “international” questions (Internationales aus dem
Volkstaat), dated January 3, 1894, i.e., written a year and a half
before his death, Engels wrote that in all his articles he used the word
“Communist”, and not "Social-Democrat", because at that time the
Proudhonists in France and the Lassalleans²⁴ in Germany called
themselves Social-Democrats.

  "... For Marx and myself," continued Engels, "it was therefore
  absolutely impossible to use such a loose term to characterize our
  special point of view. Today things are different, and the word
  ["Social-Democrat"] may perhaps pass muster [mag passieren], inexact
  [unpassend, unsuitable] though it still is for a party whose economic
  programme is not merely socialist in general, but downright communist,
  and whose ultimate political aim is to overcome the whole state and,
  consequently, democracy as well. The names of real political parties,
  however, are never wholly appropriate; the party develops while the
  name stays."²⁵

The dialectician Engels remained true to dialectics to the end of his
days. Marx and I, he said, had a splendid, scientifically exact name for
the party, but there was no real party, i.e., no mass proletarian party.
Now (at the end of the 19th century) there was a real party, but its
name was scientifically wrong. Never mind, it would "pass muster", so
long as the party developed, so long as the scientific in accuracy of
the name was not hidden from it and did not hinder its development on
the right direction!

Perhaps some wit would console us Bolsheviks in the manner of Engels: we
have a real party, it is developing splendidly; even such a meaningless
and ugly term as “Bolshevik” will "pass muster", although it expresses
nothing whatever but the purely accidental fact that at the
Brussels-London Congress of 1903 we were in the majority. Perhaps now
that the persecution of our Party by republicans and “revolutionary”
petty-bourgeois democrats in July and August has earned the name
“Bolshevik” such universal respect, now that, in addition, this
persecution marks the tremendous historical progress our Party has made
in its real development--perhaps now even I might hesitate to insist on
the suggestion I made in April to change the name of our Party. Perhaps
I would propose a “compromise” to my comrades, namely, to call ourselves
the Communist Party, but to retain the word “Bolshevik” in brackets.

But the question of the name of the Party is incomparably less important
than the question of the attitude of the revolutionary proletariat to
the state.

In the usual argument about the state, the mistake is constantly made
against which Engels warned and which we have in passing indicated
above, namely, it is constantly forgotten that the abolition of the
state means also the abolition of democracy; that the withering away of
the state means the withering away of democracy.

At first sight this assertion seems exceedingly strange and
incomprehensible; indeed, someone may even suspect us of expecting the
advent of a system of society in which the principle of subordination of
the minority to the majority will not be observed--for democracy means
the recognition of this very principle.

No, democracy is not identical with the subordination of the minority to
the majority. Democracy is a state which recognizes the subordination of
the minority to the majority, i.e., an organization for the systematic
use of force by one class against another, by one section of the
population against another.

We set ourselves the ultimate aim of abolishing the state, i.e., all
organized and systematic violence, all use of violence against people in
general. We do not expect the advent of a system of society in which the
principle of subordination of the minority to the majority will not be
observed. In striving for socialism, however, we are convinced that it
will develop into communism and, therefore, that the need for violence
against people in general, for the subordination of one man to another,
and of one section of the population to another, will vanish altogether
since people will become accustomed to observing the elementary
conditions of social life without violence and without subordination.

In order to emphasize this element of habit, Engels speaks of a new
generation, "reared in new, free social conditions", which will "be able
to discard the entire lumber of the state"--of any state, including the
democratic-republican state.

In order to explain this, it is necessary to analyze the economic basis
of the withering away of the state.


Chapter V: The Economic Basis of the Withering Away of the State

Marx explains this question most thoroughly in his _Critique of the
Gotha Programme_ (letter to Bracke, May 5, 1875, which was not published
until 1891 when it was printed in Neue Zeit, vol. IX, 1, and which has
appeared in Russian in a special edition). The polemical part of this
remarkable work, which contains a criticism of Lassalleanism, has, so to
speak, overshadowed its positive part, namely, the analysis of the
connection between the development of communism and the withering away
of the state.

1. Presentation of the Question by Marx

From a superficial comparison of Marx's letter to Bracke of May 5, 1875,
with Engels' letter to Bebel of March 28, 1875, which we examined above,
it might appear that Marx was much more of a "champion of the state"
than Engels, and that the difference of opinion between the two writers
on the question of the state was very considerable.

Engels suggested to Bebel that all chatter about the state be dropped
altogether, that the word “state” be eliminated from the programme
altogether and the word “community” substituted for it. Engels even
declared that the Commune was long a state in the proper sense of the
word. Yet Marx even spoke of the "future state in communist society",
i.e., he would seem to recognize the need for the state even under
communism.

But such a view would be fundamentally wrong. A closer examination shows
that Marx's and Engels' views on the state and its withering away were
completely identical, and that Marx's expression quoted above refers to
the state in the process of withering away.

Clearly, there can be no question of specifying the moment of the future
"withering away", the more so since it will obviously be a lengthy
process. The apparent difference between Marx and Engels is due to the
fact that they dealt with different subject and pursued different aims.
Engels set out to show Bebel graphically, sharply, and in broad outline
the utter absurdity of the current prejudices concerning the state
(shared to no small degree by Lassalle). Marx only touched upon this
question in passing, being interested in another subject, namely, the
development of communist society.

The whole theory of Marx is the application of the theory of
development--in its most consistent, complete, considered and pithy
form--to modern capitalism. Naturally, Marx was faced with the problem
of applying this theory both to the forthcoming collapse of capitalism
and to the future development of future communism.

On the basis of what facts, then, can the question of the future
development of future communism be dealt with?

On the basis of the fact that it has its origin in capitalism, that it
develops historically from capitalism, that it is the result of the
action of a social force to which capitalism gave birth. There is no
trace of an attempt on Marx's part to make up a utopia, to indulge in
idle guess-work about what cannot be known. Marx treated the question of
communism in the same way as a naturalist would treat the question of
the development of, say, a new biological variety, once he knew that it
had originated in such and such a way and was changing in such and such
a definite direction.

To begin with, Marx brushed aside the confusion the Gotha Programme
brought into the question of the relationship between state and society.
He wrote:

  "'Present-day society' is capitalist society, which exists in all
  civilized countries, being more or less free from medieval admixture,
  more or less modified by the particular historical development of each
  country, more or less developed. On the other hand, the 'present-day
  state' changes with a country's frontier. It is different in the
  Prusso-German Empire from what it is in Switzerland, and different in
  England from what it is in the United States. 'The present-day state'
  is, therefore, a fiction.

  "Nevertheless, the different states of the different civilized
  countries, in spite of their motley diversity of form, all have this
  in common, that they are based on modern bourgeois society, only one
  more or less capitalistically developed. The have, therefore, also
  certain essential characteristics in common. In this sense it is
  possible to speak of the 'present-day state', in contrast with the
  future, in which its present root, bourgeois society, will have died
  off.

  "The question then arises: what transformation will the state undergo
  in communist society? In other words, what social functions will
  remain in existence there that are analogous to present state
  functions? This question can only be answered scientifically, and one
  does not get a flea-hop nearer to the problem by a thousandfold
  combination of the word people with the word state²⁶."

After thus ridiculing all talk about a "people's state", Marx formulated
the question and gave warning, as it were, that those seeking a
scientific answer to it should use only firmly-established scientific
data.

The first fact that has been established most accurately by the whole
theory of development, by science as a whole--a fact that was ignored by
the utopians, and is ignored by the present-day opportunists, who are
afraid of the socialist revolution--is that, historically, there must
undoubtedly be a special stage, or a special phase, of transition from
capitalism to communism.

2. The Transition from Capitalism to Communism

Marx continued:

  "Between capitalist and communist society lies the period of the
  revolutionary transformation of the one into the other. Corresponding
  to this is also a political transition period in which the state can
  be nothing but the revolutionary dictatorship of the proletariat."

Marx bases this conclusion on an analysis of the role played by the
proletariat in modern capitalist society, on the data concerning the
development of this society, and on the irreconcilability of the
antagonistic interests of the proletariat and the bourgeoisie.

Previously the question was put as follows: to achieve its emancipation,
the proletariat must overthrow the bourgeoisie, win political power and
establish its revolutionary dictatorship.

Now the question is put somewhat differently: the transition from
capitalist society--which is developing towards communism--to communist
society is impossible without a "political transition period", and the
state in this period can only be the revolutionary dictatorship of the
proletariat.

What, then, is the relation of this dictatorship to democracy?

We have seen that the _Communist Manifesto_ simply places side by side
the two concepts: "to raise the proletariat to the position of the
ruling class" and "to win the battle of democracy". On the basis of all
that has been said above, it is possible to determine more precisely how
democracy changes in the transition from capitalism to communism.

In capitalist society, providing it develops under the most favourable
conditions, we have a more or less complete democracy in the democratic
republic. But this democracy is always hemmed in by the narrow limits
set by capitalist exploitation, and consequently always remains, in
effect, a democracy for the minority, only for the propertied classes,
only for the rich. Freedom in capitalist society always remains about
the same as it was in the ancient Greek republics: freedom for the
slave-owners. Owing to the conditions of capitalist exploitation, the
modern wage slaves are so crushed by want and poverty that "they cannot
be bothered with democracy", "cannot be bothered with politics"; in the
ordinary, peaceful course of events, the majority of the population is
debarred from participation in public and political life.

The correctness of this statement is perhaps most clearly confirmed by
Germany, because constitutional legality steadily endured there for a
remarkably long time--nearly half a century (1871-1914)--and during this
period the Social-Democrats were able to achieve far more than in other
countries in the way of "utilizing legality", and organized a larger
proportion of the workers into a political party than anywhere else in
the world.

What is this largest proportion of politically conscious and active wage
slaves that has so far been recorded in capitalist society? One million
members of the Social-Democratic Party - out of 15,000,000 wage-workers!
Three million organized in trade unions--out of 15,000,000!

Democracy for an insignificant minority, democracy for the rich--that is
the democracy of capitalist society. If we look more closely into the
machinery of capitalist democracy, we see everywhere, in the
“petty”--supposedly petty--details of the suffrage (residential
qualifications, exclusion of women, etc.), in the technique of the
representative institutions, in the actual obstacles to the right of
assembly (public buildings are not for “paupers”!), in the purely
capitalist organization of the daily press, etc., etc.,--we see
restriction after restriction upon democracy. These restrictions,
exceptions, exclusions, obstacles for the poor seem slight, especially
in the eyes of one who has never known want himself and has never been
inclose contact with the oppressed classes in their mass life (and nine
out of 10, if not 99 out of 100, bourgeois publicists and politicians
come under this category); but in their sum total these restrictions
exclude and squeeze out the poor from politics, from active
participation in democracy.

Marx grasped this essence of capitalist democracy splendidly when, in
analyzing the experience of the Commune, he said that the oppressed are
allowed once every few years to decide which particular representatives
of the oppressing class shall represent and repress them in parliament!

But from this capitalist democracy--that is inevitably narrow and
stealthily pushes aside the poor, and is therefore hypocritical and
false through and through--forward development does not proceed simply,
directly and smoothly, towards "greater and greater democracy", as the
liberal professors and petty-bourgeois opportunists would have us
believe. No, forward development, i.e., development towards communism,
proceeds through the dictatorship of the proletariat, and cannot do
otherwise, for the resistance of the capitalist exploiters cannot be
broken by anyone else or in any other way.

And the dictatorship of the proletariat, i.e., the organization of the
vanguard of the oppressed as the ruling class for the purpose of
suppressing the oppressors, cannot result merely in an expansion of
democracy. Simultaneously with an immense expansion of democracy, which
for the first time becomes democracy for the poor, democracy for the
people, and not democracy for the money-bags, the dictatorship of the
proletariat imposes a series of restrictions on the freedom of the
oppressors, the exploiters, the capitalists. We must suppress them in
order to free humanity from wage slavery, their resistance must be
crushed by force; it is clear that there is no freedom and no democracy
where there is suppression and where there is violence.

Engels expressed this splendidly in his letter to Bebel when he said, as
the reader will remember, that "the proletariat needs the state, not in
the interests of freedom but in order to hold down its adversaries, and
as soon as it becomes possible to speak of freedom the state as such
ceases to exist".

Democracy for the vast majority of the people, and suppression by force,
i.e., exclusion from democracy, of the exploiters and oppressors of the
people--this is the change democracy undergoes during the transition
from capitalism to communism.

Only in communist society, when the resistance of the capitalists have
disappeared, when there are no classes (i.e., when there is no
distinction between the members of society as regards their relation to
the social means of production), only then "the state... ceases to
exist", and "it becomes possible to speak of freedom". Only then will a
truly complete democracy become possible and be realized, a democracy
without any exceptions whatever. And only then will democracy begin to
wither away, owing to the simple fact that, freed from capitalist
slavery, from the untold horrors, savagery, absurdities, and infamies of
capitalist exploitation, people will gradually become accustomed to
observing the elementary rules of social intercourse that have been
known for centuries and repeated for thousands of years in all copy-book
maxims. They will become accustomed to observing them without force,
without coercion, without subordination, without the special apparatus
for coercion called the state.

The expression "the state withers away" is very well-chosen, for it
indicates both the gradual and the spontaneous nature of the process.
Only habit can, and undoubtedly will, have such an effect; for we see
around us on millions of occassions how readily people become accustomed
to observing the necessary rules of social intercourse when there is no
exploitation, when there is nothing that arouses indignation, evokes
protest and revolt, and creates the need for suppression.

And so in capitalist society we have a democracy that is curtailed,
wretched, false, a democracy only for the rich, for the minority. The
dictatorship of the proletariat, the period of transition to communism,
will for the first time create democracy for the people, for the
majority, along with the necessary suppression of the exploiters, of the
minority. Communism alone is capable of providing really complete
democracy, and the more complete it is, the sooner it will become
unnecessary and wither away of its own accord.

In other words, under capitalism we have the state in the proper sense
of the word, that is, a special machine for the suppression of one class
by another, and, what is more, of the majority by the minority.
Naturally, to be successful, such an undertaking as the systematic
suppression of the exploited majority by the exploiting minority calls
for the utmost ferocity and savagery in the matter of suppressing, it
calls for seas of blood, through which mankind is actually wading its
way in slavery, serfdom and wage labor.

Furthermore, during the transition from capitalism to communism
suppression is still necessary, but it is now the suppression of the
exploiting minority by the exploited majority. A special apparatus, a
special machine for suppression, the “state”, is still necessary, but
this is now a transitional state. It is no longer a state in the proper
sense of the word; for the suppression of the minority of exploiters by
the majority of the wage slaves of yesterday is comparatively so easy,
simple and natural a task that it will entail far less bloodshed than
the suppression of the risings of slaves, serfs or wage-laborers, and it
will cost mankind far less. And it is compatible with the extension of
democracy to such an overwhelming majority of the population that the
need for a special machine of suppression will begin to disappear.
Naturally, the exploiters are unable to suppress the people without a
highly complex machine for performing this task, but the people can
suppress the exploiters even with a very simple “machine”, almost
without a “machine”, without a special apparatus, by the simple
organization of the armed people (such as the Soviets of Workers' and
Soldiers' Deputies, we would remark, running ahead).

Lastly, only communism makes the state absolutely unnecessary, for there
is nobody to be suppressed--“nobody” in the sense of a class, of a
systematic struggle against a definite section of the population. We are
not utopians, and do not in the least deny the possibility and
inevitability of excesses on the part of _individual persons_, or the
need to stop such excesses. In the first place, however, no special
machine, no special apparatus of suppression, is needed for this: this
will be done by the armed people themselves, as simply and as readily as
any crowd of civilized people, even in modern society, interferes to put
a stop to a scuffle or to prevent a woman from being assaulted. And,
secondly, we know that the fundamental social cause of excesses, which
consist in the violation of the rules of social intercourse, is the
exploitation of the people, their want and their poverty. With the
removal of this chief cause, excesses will inevitably begin to "wither
away". We do not know how quickly and in what succession, but we do know
they will wither away. With their withering away the state will also
wither away.

Without building utopias, Marx defined more fully what can be defined
now regarding this future, namely, the differences between the lower and
higher phases (levels, stages) of communist society.

3. The First Phase of Communist Society

In the _Critique of the Gotha Programme_, Marx goes into detail to
disprove Lassalle's idea that under socialism the worker will receive
the “undiminished” or "full product of his labor". Marx shows that from
the whole of the social labor of society there must be deducted a
reserve fund, a fund for the expansion of production, a fund for the
replacement of the "wear and tear" of machinery, and so on. Then, from
the means of consumption must be deducted a fund for administrative
expenses, for schools, hospitals, old people's homes, and so on.

Instead of Lassalle's hazy, obscure, general phrase ("the full product
of his labor to the worker"), Marx makes a sober estimate of exactly how
socialist society will have to manage its affairs. Marx proceeds to make
a concrete analysis of the conditions of life of a society in which
there will be no capitalism, and says:

  "What we have to deal with here [in analyzing the programme of the
  workers' party] is a communist society, not as it has developed on its
  own foundations, but, on the contrary, just as it emerges from
  capitalist society; which is thus in every respect, economically,
  morally, and intellectually, still stamped with the birthmarks of the
  old society from whose womb it comes."

It is this communist society, which has just emerged into the light of
day out of the womb of capitalism and which is in every respect stamped
with the birthmarks of the old society, that Marx terms the “first”, or
lower, phase of communist society.

The means of production are no longer the private property of
individuals. The means of production belong to the whole of society.
Every member of society, performing a certain part of the
socially-necessary work, receives a certificate from society to the
effect that he has done a certain amount of work. And with this
certificate he receives from the public store of consumer goods a
corresponding quantity of products. After a deduction is made of the
amount of labor which goes to the public fund, every worker, therefore,
receives from society as much as he has given to it.

“Equality” apparently reigns supreme.

But when Lassalle, having in view such a social order (usually called
socialism, but termed by Marx the first phase of communism), says that
this is "equitable distribution", that this is "the equal right of all
to an equal product of labor", Lassalle is mistaken and Marx exposes the
mistake.

"Hence, the equal right," says Marx, in this case still certainly
conforms to "bourgeois law", which,like all law, implies inequality. All
law is an application of an equal measure to different people who in
fact are not alike, are not equal to one another. That is why the "equal
right" is violation of equality and an injustice. In fact, everyone,
having performed as much social labor as another, receives an equal
share of the social product (after the above-mentioned deductions).

But people are not alike: one is strong, another is weak; one is
married, another is not; one has more children, another has less, and so
on. And the conclusion Marx draws is:

  "... With an equal performance of labor, and hence an equal share in
  the social consumption fund, one will in fact receive more than
  another, one will be richer than another, and so on. To avoid all
  these defects, the right instead of being equal would have to be
  unequal."

The first phase of communism, therefore, cannot yet provide justice and
equality; differences, and unjust differences, in wealth will still
persist, but the exploitation of man by man will have become impossible
because it will be impossible to seize the means of production--the
factories, machines, land, etc.--and make them private property. In
smashing Lassalle's petty-bourgeois, vague phrases about “equality” and
“justice” in general, Marx shows the course of development of communist
society, which is compelled to abolish at first only the “injustice” of
the means of production seized by individuals, and which is unable at
once to eliminate the other injustice, which consists in the
distribution of consumer goods "according to the amount of labor
performed" (and not according to needs).

The vulgar economists, including the bourgeois professors and “our”
Tugan, constantly reproach the socialists with forgetting the inequality
of people and with “dreaming” of eliminating this inequality. Such a
reproach, as we see, only proves the extreme ignorance of the bourgeois
ideologists.

Marx not only most scrupulously takes account of the inevitable
inequality of men, but he also takes into account the fact that the mere
conversion of the means of production into the common property of the
whole society (commonly called “socialism”) does not remove the defects
of distribution and the inequality of "bourgeois laws" which continues
to prevail so long as products are divided "according to the amount of
labor performed". Continuing, Marx says:

  "But these defects are inevitable in the first phase of communist
  society as it is when it has just emerged, after prolonged birth
  pangs, from capitalist society. Law can never be higher than the
  economic structure of society and its cultural development conditioned
  thereby."

And so, in the first phase of communist society (usually called
socialism) "bourgeois law" is not abolished in its entirety, but only in
part, only in proportion to the economic revolution so far attained,
i.e., only in respect of the means of production. "Bourgeois law"
recognizes them as the private property of individuals. Socialism
converts them into common property. To that extent--and to that extent
alone--"bourgeois law" disappears.

However, it persists as far as its other part is concerned; it persists
in the capacity of regulator (determining factor) in the distribution of
products and the allotment of labor among the members of society. The
socialist principle, "He who does not work shall not eat", is already
realized; the other socialist principle, "An equal amount of products
for an equal amount of labor", is also already realized. But this is not
yet communism, and it does not yet abolish "bourgeois law", which gives
unequal individuals, in return for unequal (really unequal) amounts of
labor, equal amounts of products.

This is a “defect”, says Marx, but it is unavoidable in the first phase
of communism; for if we are not to indulge in utopianism, we must not
think that having overthrown capitalism people will at once learn to
work for society without any rules of law. Besides, the abolition of
capitalism does not immediately create the economic prerequisites for
such a change.

Now, there are no other rules than those of "bourgeois law". To this
extent, therefore, there still remains the need for a state, which,
while safeguarding the common ownership of the means of production,
would safeguard equality in labor and in the distribution of products.

The state withers away insofar as there are no longer any capitalists,
any classes, and, consequently, no class can be suppressed.

But the state has not yet completely withered away, since the still
remains the safeguarding of "bourgeois law", which sanctifies actual
inequality. For the state to wither away completely, complete communism
is necessary.

4. The Higher Phase of Communist Society

Marx continues:

  "In a higher phase of communist society, after the enslaving
  subordination of the individual to the division of labor, and with it
  also the antithesis between mental and physical labor, has vanished,
  after labor has become not only a livelihood but life's prime want,
  after the productive forces have increased with the all-round
  development of the individual, and all the springs of co-operative
  wealth flow more abundantly--only then can the narrow horizon of
  bourgeois law be left behind in its entirety and society inscribe on
  its banners: From each according to his ability, to each according to
  his needs!"

Only now can we fully appreciate the correctness of Engels' remarks
mercilessly ridiculing the absurdity of combining the words “freedom”
and “state”. So long as the state exists there is no freedom. When there
is freedom, there will be no state.

The economic basis for the complete withering away of the state is such
a high state of development of communism at which the antithesis between
mental and physical labor disappears, at which there consequently
disappears one of the principal sources of modern social inequality--a
source, moreover, which cannot on any account be removed immediately by
the mere conversion of the means of production into public property, by
the mere expropriation of the capitalists.

This expropriation will make it possible for the productive forces to
develop to a tremendous extent. And when we see how incredibly
capitalism is already retarding this development, when we see how much
progress could be achieved on the basis of the level of technique
already attained, we are entitled to say with the fullest confidence
that the expropriation of the capitalists will inevitably result in an
enormous development of the productive forces of human society. But how
rapidly this development will proceed, how soon it will reach the point
of breaking away from the division of labor, of doing away with the
antithesis between mental and physical labor, of transforming labor into
"life's prime want"--we do not and cannot know.

That is why we are entitled to speak only of the inevitable withering
away of the state, emphasizing the protracted nature of this process and
its dependence upon the rapidity of development of the higher phase of
communism, and leaving the question of the time required for, or the
concrete forms of, the withering away quite open, because there is no
material for answering these questions.

The state will be able to wither away completely when society adopts the
rule: "From each according to his ability, to each according to his
needs", i.e., when people have become so accustomed to observing the
fundamental rules of social intercourse and when their labor has become
so productive that they will voluntarily work according to their
ability. "The narrow horizon of bourgeois law", which compels one to
calculate with the heartlessness of a Shylock whether one has not worked
half an hour more than anybody else--this narrow horizon will then be
left behind. There will then be no need for society, in distributing the
products, to regulate the quantity to be received by each; each will
take freely "according to his needs".

From the bourgeois point of view, it is easy to declare that such a
social order is "sheer utopia" and to sneer at the socialists for
promising everyone the right to receive from society, without any
control over the labor of the individual citizen, any quantity of
truffles, cars, pianos, etc. Even to this day, most bourgeois “savants”
confine themselves to sneering in this way, thereby betraying both their
ignorance and their selfish defence of capitalism.

Ignorance--for it has never entered the head of any socialist to
“promise” that the higher phase of the development of communism will
arrive; as for the greatest socialists' forecast that it will arrive, it
presupposes not the present ordinary run of people, who, like the
seminary students in Pomyalovsky's stories²⁷, are capable of damaging
the stocks of public wealth "just for fun", and of demanding the
impossible.

Until the “higher” phase of communism arrives, the socialists demand the
strictest control by society and by the state over the measure of labor
and the measure of consumption; but this control must start with the
expropriation of the capitalists, with the establishment of workers'
control over the capitalists, and must be exercised not by a state of
bureaucrats, but by a state of armed workers.

The selfish defence of capitalism by the bourgeois ideologists (and
their hangers-on, like the Tseretelis, Chernovs, and Co.) consists in
that they substitute arguing and talk about the distant future for the
vital and burning question of present-day politics, namely, the
expropriation of the capitalists, the conversion of all citizens into
workers and other employees of one huge “syndicate”--the whole
state--and the complete subordination of the entire work of this
syndicate to a genuinely democratic state, the state of the Soviets of
Workers' and Soldiers' Deputies.

In fact, when a learned professor, followed by the philistine, followed
in turn by the Tseretelis and Chernovs, talks of wild utopias, of the
demagogic promises of the Bolsheviks, of the impossibility of
“introducing” socialism, it is the higher stage, or phase, of communism
he has in mind, which no one has ever promised or even thought to
“introduce”, because, generally speaking, it cannot be “introduced”.

And this brings us to the question of the scientific distinction between
socialism and communism which Engels touched on in his above-quoted
argument about the incorrectness of the name "Social-Democrat".
Politically, the distinction between the first, or lower, and the higher
phase of communism will in time, probably, be tremendous. But it would
be ridiculous to recognize this distinction now, under capitalism, and
only individual anarchists, perhaps, could invest it with primary
importance (if there still are people among the anarchists who have
learned nothing from the “Plekhanov” conversion of the Kropotkins, of
Grave, Corneliseen, and other “stars” of anarchism into social-
chauvinists or "anarcho-trenchists", as Ghe, one of the few anarchists
who have still preserved a sense of humor and a conscience, has put it).

But the scientific distinction between socialism and communism is clear.
What is usually called socialism was termed by Marx the “first”, or
lower, phase of communist society. Insofar as the means of production
becomes common property, the word “communism” is also applicable here,
providing we do not forget that this is not complete communism. The
great significance of Marx's explanations is that here, too, he
consistently applies materialist dialectics, the theory of development,
and regards communism as something which develops out of capitalism.
Instead of scholastically invented, “concocted” definitions and
fruitless disputes over words (What is socialism? What is communism?),
Marx gives an analysis of what might be called the stages of the
economic maturity of communism.

In its first phase, or first stage, communism cannot as yet be fully
mature economically and entirely free from traditions or vestiges of
capitalism. Hence the interesting phenomenon that communism in its first
phase retains "the narrow horizon of bourgeois law". Of course,
bourgeois law in regard to the distribution of consumer goods inevitably
presupposes the existence of the bourgeois state, for law is nothing
without an apparatus capable of enforcing the observance of the rules of
law.

It follows that under communism there remains for a time not only
bourgeois law, but even the bourgeois state, without the bourgeoisie!

This may sound like a paradox or simply a dialectical conundrum of which
Marxism is often accused by people who have not taken the slightest
trouble to study its extraordinarily profound content.

But in fact, remnants of the old, surviving in the new, confront us in
life at every step, both in nature and in society. And Marx did not
arbitrarily insert a scrap of “bourgeois” law into communism, but
indicated what is economically and politically inevitable in a society
emerging out of the womb of capitalism.

Democracy means equality. The great significance of the proletariat's
struggle for equality and of equality as a slogan will be clear if we
correctly interpret it as meaning the abolition of classes. But
democracy means only formal equality. And as soon as equality is
achieved for all members of society in relation to ownership of the
means of production, that is, equality of labor and wages, humanity will
inevitably be confronted with the question of advancing further from
formal equality to actual equality, i.e., to the operation of the rule
"from each according to his ability, to each according to his needs". By
what stages, by means of what practical measures humanity will proceed
to this supreme aim we do not and cannot know. But it is important to
realize how infinitely mendacious is the ordinary bourgeois conception
of socialism as something lifeless, rigid, fixed once and for all,
whereas in reality only socialism will be the beginning of a rapid,
genuine, truly mass forward movement, embracing first the majority and
then the whole of the population, in all spheres of public and private
life.

Democracy is of enormous importance to the working class in its struggle
against the capitalists for its emancipation. But democracy is by no
means a boundary not to be overstepped; it is only one of the stages on
the road from feudalism to capitalism, and from capitalism to communism.

Democracy is a form of the state, it represents, on the one hand, the
organized, systematic use of force against persons; but, on the other
hand, it signifies the formal recognition of equality of citizens, the
equal right of all to determine the structure of, and to administer, the
state. This, in turn, results in the fact that, at a certain stage in
the development of democracy, it first welds together the class that
wages a revolutionary struggle against capitalism--the proletariat, and
enables it to crush, smash to atoms, wipe off the face of the earth the
bourgeois, even the republican-bourgeois, state machine, the standing
army, the police and the bureaucracy and to substitute for them a more
democratic state machine, but a state machine nevertheless, in the shape
of armed workers who proceed to form a militia involving the entire
population.

Here "quantity turns into quality": such a degree of democracy implies
overstepping the boundaries of bourgeois society and beginning its
socialist reorganization. If really all take part in the administration
of the state, capitalism cannot retain its hold. The development of
capitalism, in turn, creates the preconditions that enable really “all”
to take part in the administration of the state. Some of these
preconditions are: universal literacy, which has already been achieved
in a number of the most advanced capitalist countries, then the
"training and disciplining" of millions of workers by the huge, complex,
socialized apparatus of the postal service, railways, big factories,
large-scale commerce, banking, etc., etc.

Given these economic preconditions, it is quite possible, after the
overthrow of the capitalists and the bureaucrats, to proceed
immediately, overnight, to replace them in the control over production
and distribution, in the work of keeping account of labor and products,
by the armed workers, by the whole of the armed population. (The
question of control and accounting should not be confused with the
question of the scientifically trained staff of engineers, agronomists,
and so on. These gentlemen are working today in obedience to the wishes
of the capitalists and will work even better tomorrow in obedience to
the wishes of the armed workers.)

Accounting and control--that is _mainly_ what is needed for the "smooth
working", for the proper functioning, of the _first phase_ of communist
society. _All_ citizens are transformed into hired employees of the
state, which consists of the armed workers. _All_ citizens becomes
employees and workers of a _single_ countrywide state “syndicate”. All
that is required is that they should work equally, do their proper share
of work, and get equal pay; the accounting and control necessary for
this have been _simplified_ by capitalism to the utmost and reduced to
the extraordinarily simple operations--which any literate person can
perform--of supervising and recording, knowledge of the four rules of
arithmetic, and issuing appropriate receipts²⁸.

When the _majority_ of the people begin independently and everywhere to
keep such accounts and exercise such control over the capitalists (now
converted into employees) and over the intellectual gentry who preserve
their capitalist habits, this control will really become universal,
general, and popular; and there will be no getting away from it, there
will be "nowhere to go".

The whole of society will have become a single office and a single
factory, with equality of labor and pay.

But this “factory” discipline, which the proletariat, after defeating
the capitalists, after overthrowing the exploiters, will extend to the
whole of society, is by no means our ideal, or our ultimate goal. It is
only a necessary _step_ for thoroughly cleansing society of all the
infamies and abominations of capitalist exploitation, and _for further_
progress.

 From the moment all members of society, or at least the vast majority,
have learned to administer the state _themselves_, have taken this work
into their own hands, have organized control over the insignificant
capitalist minority, over the gentry who wish to preserve their
capitalist habits and over the workers who have been thoroughly
corrupted by capitalism--from this moment the need for government of any
kind begins to disappear altogether. The more complete the democracy,
the nearer the moment when it becomes unnecessary. The more democratic
the “state” which consists of the armed workers, and which is "no longer
a state in the proper sense of the word", the more rapidly _every form_
of state begins to wither away.

 For when _all_ have learned to administer and actually to independently
administer social production, independently keep accounts and exercise
control over the parasites, the sons of the wealthy, the swindlers and
other "guardians of capitalist traditions", the escape from this popular
accounting and control will inevitably become so incredibly difficult,
such a rare exception, and will probably be accompanied by such swift
and severe punishment (for the armed workers are practical men and not
sentimental intellectuals, and they scarcely allow anyone to trifle with
them), that the _necessity_ of observing the simple, fundamental rules
of the community will very soon become a _habit_.

 Then the door will be thrown wide open for the transition from the
first phase of communist society to its higher phase, and with it to the
complete withering away of the state.


Chapter VI: The Vulgarisation of Marxism by Opportunists

The question of the relation of the state to the social revolution, and
of the social revolution to the state, like the question of revolution
generally, was given very little attention by the leading theoreticians
and publicists of the Second International (1889-1914). But the most
characteristic thing about the process of the gradual growth of
opportunism that led to the collapse of the Second International in 1914
is the fact that even when these people were squarely faced with this
question they tried to evade it or ignored it.

In general, it may be said that evasiveness over the question of the
relation of the proletarian revolution to the state--an evasiveness
which benefited and fostered opportunism--resulted in the distortion of
Marxism and in its complete vulgarization.

To characterize this lamentable process, if only briefly, we shall take
the most prominent theoreticians of Marxism: Plekhanov and Kautsky.

1. Plekhanov’ s Controversy with the Anarchists

Plekhanov wrote a special pamphlet on the relation of anarchism to
socialism, entitled _Anarchism and Socialism_, which was published in
german in 1894.

In treating this subject, Plekhanov contrived completely to evade the
most urgent, burning, and most politically essential issue in the
struggle against anarchism, namely, the relation of the revolution to
the state, and the question of the state in general! His pamphlet falls
into two distinct parts: one of them is historical and literary, and
contains valuable material on the history of the ideas of Stirner,
Proudhon, and others; the other is philistine, and contains a clumsy
dissertation on the theme that an anarchist cannot be distinguished from
a bandit.

It is a most amusing combination of subjects and most characteristic of
Plekhanov’ s whole activity on the eve of the revolution and during the
revolutionary period in Russia. In fact, in the years 1905 to 1917,
Plekhanov revealed himself as a semi-doctrinaire and semi-philistine
who, in politics, trailed in the wake of the bourgeoisie.

We have now seen how, in their controversy with the anarchists, marx and
Engels with the utmost thoroughness explained their views on the
relation of revolution to the state. In 1891, in his foreword to Marx’ s
_Critique of the Gotha Programme_, Engels wrote that “we”—that is,
Engels and Marx—"were at that time, hardly two years after the Hague
Congress of the [First] International²⁹, engaged in the most violent
struggle against Bakunin and his anarchists."

The anarchists had tried to claim the Paris Commune as their “own”, so
to say, as a collaboration of their doctrine; and they completely
misunderstood its lessons and Marx’ s analysis of these lessons.
Anarchism has given nothing even approximating true answers to the
concrete political questions: Must the old state machine be smashed? And
what should be put in its place?

But to speak of “anarchism and socialism” while completely evading the
question of the state, and disregarding the whole development of Marxism
before and after the Commune, meant inevitably slipping into
opportunism. For what opportunism needs most of all is that the two
questions just mentioned should not be raised at all. That in itself is
a victory for opportunism.

2. Kautsky’ s Controversy with the Opportunists

Undoubtedly, an immeasurably larger number of Kautsky’ s works have been
translated into Russian than into any other language. It is not without
reason that some German Social-Democrats say in jest that Kautsky is
read more in Russia than in Germany (let us say, in parenthesis, that
this jest has a far deeper historical meaning than those who first made
it suspect. The Russian workers, by making in 1905 an unusually great
and unprecedented demand for the best works of the best Social-
Democratic literature and editions of these works in quantities unheard
of in other countries, rapidly transplanted, so to speak, the enormous
experience of a neighboring, more advanced country to the young soil of
our proletarian movement).

Besides his popularization of Marxism, Kautsky is particularly known in
our country for his controversy with the opportunists, with Bernstein at
their head. One fact, however, is almost unknown, one which cannot be
ignored if we set out to investigate how Kautsky drifted into the morass
of unbelievably disgraceful confusion and defence of social-chauvinism
during the supreme crisis of 1914-15. This fact is as follows: shortly
before he came out against the most prominent representatives of
opportunism in France (Millerand and Jaures) and in Germany (Bernstein),
Kautsky betrayed very considerable vacillation. The Marxist _Zarya³⁰_,
which was published in Stuttgart in 1901-02, and advocated revolutionary
proletarian views, was forced to enter into controversy with Kautsky and
describe as “elastic” the half-hearted, evasive resolution, conciliatory
towards the opportunists, that he proposed at the International
Socialist Congress in Paris in 1900³¹. Kautsky’ s letters published in
Germany reveal no less hesitancy on his part before he took the field
against Bernstein.

Of immeasurably greater significance, however, is the fact that, in his
very controversy with the opportunists, in his formulation of the
question and his manner of treating it, we can new see, as we study the
history of Kautsky’ s latest betrayal of Marxism, his systematic
deviation towards opportunism precisely on the question of the state.

Let us take Kautsky’ s first important work against opportunism,
_Bernstein and the Social-Democratic Programme_. Kautsky refutes
Bernstein in detail, but here is a characteristic thing:

Bernstein, in his _Premises of Socialism_, of Herostratean fame, accuses
Marxism of “Blanquism” (an accusation since repeated thousands of times
by the opportunists and liberal bourgeoisie in Russia against the
revolutionary Marxists, the Bolsheviks). In this connection Bernstein
dwells particularly on Marx’ s _The Civil War in France_, and tries,
quite unsuccessfully, as we have seen, to identify Marx’ s views on the
lessons of the Commune with those of Proudhon. Bernstein pays particular
attention to the conclusion which Marx emphasized in his 1872 preface to
the _Communist Manifesto_, namely, that “the working class cannot simply
lay hold of the ready-made state machinery and wield it for its own
purposes".

This statement “pleased” Bernstein so much that he used it no less than
three times in his book, interpreting it in the most distorted,
opportunist way.

As we have seen, Marx meant that the working-class must smash, break,
shatter (_sprengung_, explosion—the expression used by Engels) the whole
state machine. But according to Bernstein it would appear as though Marx
in these words warned the working class against excessive revolutionary
zeal when seizing power.

A cruder more hideous distortion of Marx’ s idea cannot be imagined.

How, then, did Kautsky proceed in his most detailed refutation of
Bernsteinism?

He refrained from analyzing the utter distortion of Marxism by
opportunism on this point. He cited the above-quoted passage from
Engels’ preface to Marx’ s _Civil War_ and said that according to Marx
the working class cannot simply take over the ready-made state
machinery, but that, generally speaking, it can take it over—and that
was all. Kautsky did not say a word about the fact that Bernstein
attributed to Marx the very opposite of Marx’ s real idea, that since
1852 Marx had formulated the task of the proletarian revolution as being
to “smash” the state machine.

The result was that the most essential distinction between Marxism and
opportunism on the subject of the tasks of the proletarian revolution
was slurred over by Kautsky!

  “We can quite safely leave the solution of the problems of the
  proletarian dictatorship of the future,” said Kautsky, writing
  “against” Bernstein. (p.172, German edition)

This is not a polemic against Bernstein, but, in essence, a concession
to him, a surrender to opportunism; for at present the opportunists ask
nothing better than to “quite safely leave to the future” all
fundamental questions of the tasks of the proletarian revolution.

From 1852 to 1891, or for 40 years, Marx and Engels taught the
proletariat that it must smash the state machine. Yet, in 1899, Kautsky,
confronted with the complete betrayal of Marxism by the opportunists on
this point, fraudulently substituted for the question whether it is
necessary to smash this machine the question for the concrete forms in
which it is to be smashed, and then sough refuge behind the
“indisputable” (and barren) philistine truth that concrete forms cannot
be known in advance!!

A gulf separates Marx and Kautsky over their attitude towards the
proletarian party’ s task of training the working class for revolution.

Let us take the next, more mature, work by Kautsky, which was also
largely devoted to a refutation of opportunist errors. It is his
pamphlet, _The Social Revolution_. In this pamphlet, the author chose as
his special theme the question of “the proletarian revolution” and “the
proletarian regime". He gave much that was exceedingly valuable, but he
avoided the question of the state. Throughout the pamphlet the author
speaks of the winning of state power—and no more; that is, he has chosen
a formula which makes a concession to the opportunists, inasmuch as it
admits the possibility of seizing power without destroying the state
machine. The very thing which Marx in 1872 declared to be “obsolete” in
the programme of the _Communist Manifesto_, is revived by Kautsky in
1902.

A special section in the pamphlet is devoted to the “forms and weapons
of the social revolution". Here Kautsky speaks of the mass political
strike, of civil war, and of the “instruments of the might of the modern
large state, its bureaucracy and the army"; but he does not say a word
about what the Commune has already taught the workers. Evidently, it was
not without reason that Engels issued a warning, particularly to the
German socialists. against “superstitious reverence” for the state.

Kautsky treats the matter as follows: the victorious proletariat “will
carry out the democratic programme", and he goes on to formulate its
clauses. But he does not say a word about the new material provided in
1871 on the subject of the replacement of bourgeois democracy by
proletarian democracy. Kautsky disposes of the question by using such
“impressive-sounding” banalities as:

  “Still, it goes without saying that we shall not achieve supremacy
  under the present conditions. Revolution itself presupposes long and
  deep-going struggles, which, in themselves, will change our present
  political and social structure."

Undoubtedly, this “goes without saying,” just as the fact that horses
eat oats of the Volga flows into the Caspian. Only it is a pity that an
empty and bombastic phrase about “deep-going” struggles is used to avoid
a question of vital importance to the revolutionary proletariat, namely,
what makes its revolution “deep-going” in relation to the state, to
democracy, as distinct from previous, non-proletarian revolutions.

By avoiding this question, Kautsky in practice makes a concession to
opportunism on this most essential point, although in words he declares
stern war against it and stresses the importance of the “idea of
revolution” (how much is this “idea” worth when one is afraid to teach
the workers the concrete lessons of revolution?), or says,
“revolutionary idealism before everything else", or announces that the
English workers are now “hardly more than petty bourgeois".

  “The most varied form of enterprises—bureaucratic [??], trade
  unionist, co-operative, private... can exist side by side in socialist
  society,” Kautsky writes. “... There are, for example, enterprises
  which cannot do without a bureaucratic [??] organization, such as the
  railways. Here the democratic organization may take the following
  shape: the workers elect delegates who form a sort of parliament,
  which establishes the working regulations and supervises the
  management of the bureaucratic apparatus. The management of other
  countries may be transferred to the trade unions, and still others may
  become co-operative enterprises."

This argument is erroneous; it is a step backward compared with the
explanations Marx and Engels gave in the seventies, using the lessons of
the Commune as an example.

As far as the supposedly necessary “bureaucratic” organization is
concerned, there is no difference whatever between a railway and any
other enterprise in large-scale machine industry, any factory, large
shop, or large-scale capitalist agricultural enterprise. The technique
of all these enterprises makes absolutely imperative the strictest
discipline, the utmost precision on the part of everyone in carry out
his allotted task, for otherwise the whole enterprise may come to a
stop, or machinery or the finished product may be damaged. In all these
enterprises the workers will, of course, “elect delegates who will form
a sort of parliament".

The whole point, however, is that this “sort of parliament” will not be
a parliament in the sense of a bourgeois parliamentary institution. The
whole point is that this “sort of parliament” will not merely “establish
the working regulations and supervise the management of the bureaucratic
apparatus,” as Kautsky, whose thinking does not go beyond the bounds of
bourgeois parliamentarianism, imagines. In socialist society, the “sort
of parliament” consisting of workers’ deputies will, of course,
“establish the working regulations and supervise the management” of the
“apparatus,” but this apparatus will not be “bureaucratic.”

Kautsky has not reflected at all on Marx’ s words: “The Commune was a
working, not parliamentary, body, executive and legislative at the same
time."

Kautsky has not understood at all the difference between bourgeois
parliamentarism, which combines democracy (not for the people) with
bureaucracy (against the people), and proletarian democracy, which will
take immediate steps to cut bureaucracy down to the roots, and which
will be able to carry these measures through to the end, to the complete
abolition of bureaucracy, to the introduction of complete democracy for
the people.

Kautsky here displays the same old “superstitious reverence” for the
state, and “superstitious belief” in bureaucracy.

Let us now pass to the last and best of Kautsky’ s works against the
opportunists, his pamphlet _The Road to Power_ (which, I believe, has
not been published in Russian, for it appeared in 1909, when reaction
was at its height in our country). This pamphlet is a big step forward,
since it does not deal with the revolutionary programme in general, as
the pamphlet of 1899 against Bernstein, or with the tasks of the social
revolution irrespective of the time of its occurrence, as the 1902
pamphlet, _The Social Revolution_; it deals with the concrete conditions
which compels us to recognize that the “era of revolutions” is setting
in.

The author explicitly points to the aggravation of class antagonisms in
general and to imperialism, which plays a particularly important part in
this respect. After the “revolutionary period of 1789-1871” in Western
Europe, he says, a similar period began in the East in 1905. A world war
is approaching with menacing rapidity. “It [the proletariat] can no
longer talk of premature revolution.” “We have entered a revolutionary
period.” The “revolutionary era is beginning".

These statements are perfectly clear. This pamphlet of Kautsky’ s should
serve as a measure of comparison of what the German Social-Democrats
promised to be before the imperialist war and the depth of degradation
to which they, including Kautsky himself, sank when the war broke out.
“The present situation,” Kautsky wrote in the pamphlet under survey, “is
fraught with the danger that we [i.e., the German Social-Democrats] may
easily appear to be more ’ moderate’ than we really are.” It turned out
that in reality the German Social-Democratic Party was much more
moderate and opportunist than it appeared to be!

It is all the more characteristic, therefore, that although Kautsky so
explicitly declared that the era of revolution had already begun, in the
pamphlet which he himself said was devoted to an analysis of the
“political revolution", he again completely avoided the question of the
state.

These evasions of the question, these omissions and equivocations,
inevitably added up to that complete swing-over to opportunism with
which we shall now have to deal.

Kautsky, the German Social-Democrats’ spokesman, seems to have declared:
I abide by revolutionary views (1899), I recognize, above all, the
inevitability of the social revolution of the proletariat (1902), I
recognize the advent of a new era of revolutions (1909). Still, I am
going back on what Marx said as early as 1852, since the question of the
tasks of the proletarian revolution in relation to the state is being
raised (1912).

It was in this point-blank form that the question was put in Kautsky’ s
controversy with Pannekoek.

3. Kautsky’ s Controversy with Pannekoek

In opposing Kautsky, Pannekoek came out as one of the representatives of
the “Left radical” trend which included Rosa Luxemburg, Karl Radek, and
others. Advocating revolutionary tactics, they were united in the
conviction that Kautsky was going over to the “Centre”, which wavered in
an unprincipled manner between Marxism and opportunism. This view was
proved perfectly correct by the war, when this “Centrist” (wrongly
called Marxist) trend, or Kautskyism, revealed itself in all its
repulsive wretchedness.

In an article touching on the question of the state, entitled “Mass
Action and Revolution” (_Neue Zeit_, 1912, Vol.XXX, 2), Pannekoek
described kautsky’ s attitude as one of “passive radicalism", as “a
theory of inactive expectancy". “Kautsky refuses to see the process of
revolution,” wrote Pannekoek (p.616). In presenting the matter in this
way, Pannekoek approached the subject which interests us, namely, the
tasks of the proletarian revolution in relation to the state.

  “The struggle of the proletariat,” he wrote, “is not merely a struggle
  against the bourgeoisie for state power, but a struggle against state
  power.... The content of this [the proletarian] revolution is the
  destruction and dissolution [Auflosung] of the instruments of power of
  the state with the aid of the instruments of power of the proletariat.
  (p.544) “The struggle will cease only when, as the result of it, the
  state organization is completely destroyed. The organization of the
  majority will then have demonstrated its superiority by destroying the
  organization of the ruling minority.” (p.548)

The formulation in which Pannekoek presented his ideas suffers from
serious defects. But its meaning is clear nonetheless, and it is
interesting to note how Kautsky combated it.

  “Up to now,” he wrote, “the antithesis between the Social-Democrats
  and the anarchists has been that the former wished to win the state
  power while the latter wished to destroy it. Pannekoek wants to do
  both.” (p.724)

Although Pannekoek’ s exposition lacks precision and concreteness—not to
speak of other shortcomings of his article which have no bearing on the
present subject—Kautsky seized precisely on the point of principle
raised by Pannekoek; and on this fundamental point of principle Kautsky
completely abandoned the Marxist position and went over wholly to
opportunism. His definition of the distinction between the
Social-Democrats and the anarchists is absolutely wrong; he completely
vulgarizes and distorts Marxism.

The distinction between Marxists and the anarchists is this: (1) The
former, while aiming at the complete abolition of the state, recognize
that this aim can only be achieved after classes have been abolished by
the socialist revolution, as the result of the establishment of
socialism, which leads to the withering away of the state. The latter
want to abolish he state completely overnight, not understanding the
conditions under which the state can be abolished. (2) The former
recognize that after the proletariat has won political power it must
completely destroy the old state machine and replace it by a new one
consisting of an organization of the armed workers, after the type of
the Commune. The latter, while insisting on the destruction of the state
machine, have a very vague idea of what the proletariat will put in its
place and how it will use its revolutionary power. The anarchists even
deny that the revolutionary proletariat should use the state power, they
reject its revolutionary dictatorship. (3) The former demand that the
proletariat be trained for revolution by utilizing the present state.
The anarchists reject this.

In this controversy, it is not Kautsky but Pannekoek who represents
Marxism, for it was Marx who taught that the proletariat cannot simply
win state power in the sense that the old state apparatus passes into
new hands, but must smash this apparatus, must break it and replace it
by a new one.

Kautsky abandons Marxism for the opportunist camp, for this destruction
of the state machine, which is utterly unacceptable to the opportunists,
completely disappears from his argument, and he leaves a loophole for
them in that “conquest” may be interpreted as the simple acquisition of
a majority.

To cover up his distortion of Marxism, Kautsky behaves like a
doctrinaire: he puts forward a “quotation” from Marx himself. In 1850,
Marx wrote that a “resolute centralization of power in the hands of the
state authority” was necessary, and Kautsky triumphantly asks: does
Pannekoek want to destroy “Centralism”?

This is simply a trick, like Bernstein’ s identification of the views of
Marxism and Proudhonism on the subject of federalism as against
centralism.

Kautsky’ s “quotation” is neither here nor there. Centralism is possible
with both the old and the new state machine. If the workers voluntarily
unite their armed forces, this will be centralism, but it will be based
on the “complete destruction” of the centralized state apparatus—the
standing army, the police, and the bureaucracy. Kautsky acts like an
outright swindler by evading the perfectly well-known arguments of Marx
and Engels on the Commune and plucking out a quotation which has nothing
to do with the point at issue.

  “Perhaps he [Pannekoek],” Kautsky continues, “wants to abolish the
  state functions of the officials? But we cannot do without officials
  even in the party and trade unions, let alone in the state
  administration. And our programme does not demand the abolition of
  state officials, but that they be elected by the people.... We are
  discussing here not the form the administrative apparatus of the ’
  future state’ will assume, but whether our political struggle
  abolishes [literally dissolves - auflost] the state power before we
  have captured it. [Kautsky’ s italics] Which ministry with its
  officials could be abolished?” Then follows an enumeration of the
  ministeries of education, justice, finance, and war. “No, not one of
  the present ministries will be removed by our political struggle
  against the government.... I repeat, in order to prevent
  misunderstanding: we are not discussing here the form the ’ future
  state’ will be given by the victorious Social- Democrats, but how the
  present state is changed by our opposition.” (p.725)

This is an obvious trick. Pannekoek raised the question of revolution.
Both the title of his article and the passages quoted above clearly
indicate this. By skipping to the question of “opposition”, Kautksy
substitutes the opportunist for the revolutionary point of view. What he
says means: at present we are an opposition; what we shall be after we
have captured power, that we shall see. Revolution has vanished! And
that is exactly what the opportunists wanted.

The point at issue is neither opposition nor political struggle in
general, but revolution. Revolution consists in the proletariat
destroying the “administrative apparatus” and the whole state machine,
replacing it by a new one, made up of the armed workers. Kautsky
displays a “superstitious reverence” for “ministries”; but why can they
not be replaced, say, by committees of specialists working under
sovereign, all-powerful Soviets of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies?

The point is not at all whether the “ministries” will remain, or whether
“committees of specialists” or some other bodies will be set up; that is
quite immaterial. The point is whether the old state machine (bound by
thousands of threads to the bourgeoisie and permeated through and
through with routine and inertia) shall remain, or be destroyed and
replaced by a new one. Revolution consists not in the new class
commanding, governing with the aid of the old state machine, but in this
class smashing this machine and commanding, governing with the aid of a
new machine. Kautsky slurs over this basic idea of Marxism, or he does
not understand it at all.

His question about officials clearly shows that he does not understand
the lessons of the Commune or the teachings of Marx. “We cannot to
without officials even in the party and the trade unions...."

We cannot do without officials under capitalism, under the rule of the
bourgeoisie. The proletariat is oppressed, the working people are
enslaved by capitalism. Under capitalism, democracy is restricted,
cramped, curtailed, mutilated by all the conditions of wage slavery, and
the poverty and misery of the people. This and this alone is the reason
why the functionaries of our political organizations and trade unions
are corrupted - or rather tend to be corrupted—by the conditions of
capitalism and betray a tendency to become bureaucrats, i.e., privileged
persons divorced from the people and standing above the people.

That is the essence of bureaucracy; and until the capitalists have been
expropriated and the bourgeoisie overthrown, even proletarian
functionaries will inevitably be “bureaucratized” to a certain extent.

According to Kautsky, since elected functionaries will remain under
socialism, so will officials, so will the bureaucracy! This is exactly
where he is wrong. Marx, referring to the example of the Commune, showed
that under socialism functionaries will cease to be “bureaucrats”, to be
“officials”, they will cease to be so in proportion as—in addition to
the principle of election of officials—the principle of recall at any
time is also introduced, as salaries are reduced to the level of the
wages of the average workman, and as parliamentary institutions are
replaced by “working bodies, executive and legislative at the same
time".

As a matter of fact, the whole of Kautsky’ s argument against Pannekoek,
and particularly the former’ s wonderful point that we cannot do without
officials even in our party and trade union organizations, is merely a
repetition of Bernstein’ s old “arguments” against Marxism in general.
In his renegade book, The Premises of Socialism, Bernstein combats the
ideas of “primitive” democracy, combats what he calls “doctrinaire
democracy": binding mandates, unpaid officials, impotent central
representative bodies, etc. to prove that this “primitive” democracy is
unsound, Bernstein refers to the experience of the British trade unions,
as interpreted by the Webbs³². Seventy years of development “in absolute
freedom", he says (p.137, German edition), convinced the trade unions
that primitive democracy was useless, and they replaced it by ordinary
democracy, i.e., parliamentarism combined with bureaucracy.

In reality, the trade unions did not develop “in absolute freedom” but
in absolute capitalist slavery, under which, it goes without saying, a
number of concessions to the prevailing evil, violence, falsehood,
exclusion of the poor from the affairs of “higher” administration,
“cannot be done without". Under socialism much of “primitive” democracy
will inevitably be revived, since, for the first time in the history of
civilized society the mass of population will rise to taking an
independent part, not only in voting and elections, but also in the
everyday administration of the state. Under socialism all will govern in
turn and will soon become accustomed to no one governing.

Marx’ s critico-analytical genius saw in the practical measures of the
Commune the turning-point which the opportunists fear and do not want to
recognize because of their cowardice, because they do not want to break
irrevocably with the bourgeoisie, and which the anarchists do not want
to see, either because they are in a hurry or because they do not
understand at all the conditions of great social changes. “We must not
even think of destroying the old state machine; how can we do without
ministries and officials>” argues the opportunist, who is completely
saturated with philistinism and who, at bottom, not only does not
believe in revolution, in the creative power of revolution, but lives in
mortal dread of it (like our Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries).

“We must think only of destroying the old state machine; it is no use
probing into the concrete lessons of earlier proletarian revolutions and
analyzing what to put in the place of what has been destroyed, and how,”
argues the anarchist (the best of the anarchist, of course, and not
those who, following the Kropotkins and Co., trail behind the
bourgeoisie). Consequently, the tactics of the anarchist become the
tactics of despair instead of a ruthlessly bold revolutionary effort to
solve concrete problems while taking into account the practical
conditions of the mass movement.

Marx teaches us to avoid both errors; he teaches us to act with supreme
boldness in destroying the entire old state machine, and at the same
time he teaches us to put the question concretely: the Commune was able
in the space of a few weeks to start building a new, proletarian state
machine by introducing such-and-such measures to provide wider democracy
and to uproot bureaucracy. Let us learn revolutionary boldness from the
Communards; let us see in their practical measures the outline of really
urgent and immediately possible measures, and then, following this road,
we shall achieve the complete destruction of bureaucracy.

The possibility of this destruction is guaranteed by the fact that
socialism will shorten the working day, will raise the people to a new
life, will create such conditions for the majority of the population as
will enable everybody, without exception, to perform “state functions",
and this will lead to the complete withering away of every form of state
in general.

  “Its object [the object of the mass strike],” Kautsky continues,
  “cannot be to destroy the state power; its only object can be to make
  the government compliant on some specific question, or to replace a
  government hostile to the proletariat by one willing to meet it
  half-way [entgegenkommende]... But never, under no circumstances can
  it [that is, the proletarian victory over a hostile government] lead
  to the destruction of the state power; it can lead only to a certain
  shifting [verschiebung] of the balance of forces within the state
  power.... The aim of our political struggle remains, as in the past,
  the conquest of state power by winning a majority in parliament and by
  raising parliament to the ranks of master of the government.” (pp.726,
  727, 732)

This is nothing but the purest and most vulgar opportunism: repudiating
revolution in deeds, while accepting it in words. Kautsky’ s thoughts go
no further than a “government... willing to meet the proletariat
half-way"—a step backward to philistinism compared with 1847, when the
_Communist Manifesto_ proclaimed “the organization of the proletariat as
the ruling class".

Kautsky will have to achieve his beloved “unity” with the Scheidmanns,
Plekhanovs, and Vanderveldes, all of whom agree to fight for a
government “willing to meet the proletariat half-way".

We, however, shall break with these traitors to socialism, and we shall
fight for the complete destruction of the old state machine, in order
that the armed proletariat itself _may become the government_. These are
two vastly different things.

Kautsky will have to enjoy the pleasant company of the Legiens and
Davids, Plekhanovs, Potresovs, Tseretelis, and Chernovs, who are quite
willing to work for the “shifting of the balance of forces within the
state power", for “winning a majority in parliament", and “raising
parliament to the ranks of master of the government". A most worthy
object, which is wholly acceptable to the opportunists and which keeps
everything within the bounds of the bourgeois parliamentary republic.

We, however, shall break with the opportunists; and the entire
class-conscious proletariat will be with us in the fight—not to “shift
the balance of forces", but to overthrow the bourgeoisie, to destroy
bourgeois parliamentarism, for a democratic republic after the type of
the Commune, or a republic of Soviets of Workers’ and Soldiers’
Deputies, for the revolutionary dictatorship of the proletariat.

To the right of Kautsky in international socialism there are trends such
as Socialist Monthly³³ in Germany (Legien, David, Kolb, and many others,
including the Scandinavian Stauning and Branting), Jaures’ followers and
Vandervelde in France and Belgium; Turait, Treves, and other
Right-wingers of the Italian Party; the Fabians and “Independents” (the
Independent labor Party, which, in fact, has always been dependent on
the Liberals) in Britain; and the like. All these gentry, who play a
tremendous, very often a predominant role in the parliamentary work and
the press of their parties, repudiate outright the dictatorship of the
proletariat and pursue a policy of undisguised opportunism. In the eyes
of these gentry, the “dictatorship” of the proletariat “contradicts”
democracy!! There is really no essential distinction between them and
the petty-bourgeois democrats.

Taking this circumstance into consideration, we are justified in drawing
the conclusion that the Second International, that is, the overwhelming
majority of its official representatives, has completely sunk into
opportunism. The experience of the Commune has been not only ignored but
distorted. far from inculcating in the workers’ minds the idea that the
time is nearing when they must act to smash the old state machine,
replace it by a new one, and in this way make their political rule the
foundation for the socialist reorganization of society, they have
actually preached to the masses the very opposite and have depicted the
“conquest of power” in a way that has left thousands of loopholes for
opportunism.

The distortion and hushing up of the question of the relation of the
proletarian revolution to the state could not but play an immense role
at a time when states, which possess a military apparatus expanded as a
consequence of imperialist rivalry, have become military monsters which
are exterminating millions of people in order to settle the issue as to
whether Britain or Germany—this or that finance capital—is to rule the
world.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The MS. continues as follows:

CHAPTER VII: THE EXPERIENCE OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTIONS OF 1905 AND 1917

The subject indicated in the title of this chapter is so vast that
volumes could be written about it. In the present pamphlet we shall have
to confine ourselves, naturally, to the most important lessons provided
by experience, those bearing directly upon the tasks of the proletariat
in the revolution with regard to state power. [Here the manuscript
breaks off—Ed.]


Postscript to the First Edition

This pamphlet was written in August and September 1917. I had already
drawn up the plan for the next, the seventh chapter, "The Experience of
the Russian Revolutions of 1905 and 1917". Apart from the title,
however, I had no time to write a single line of the chapter; I was
"interrupted" by a political crisis--the eve of the October revolution
of 1917. Such an "interruption" can only be welcomed; but the writing of
the second part of this pamphlet ("The Experience of the Russian
Revolutions of 1905 and 1917") will probably have to be put off for a
long time. It is more pleasant and useful to go through the "experience
of revolution" than to write about it.

_THE AUTHOR_

Petrograd

November 30, 1917

1Fabians--members of the Fabian Society, a British reformist
organisation founded in 1884. It grouped mostly bourgeois
intellectuals--scholars, writers, politicians--including Sydney and
Beatrice Webb, Ramsay MacDonald and Bernard Shaw. The Fabians denied the
necessity for the proletarian class struggle and for the socialist
revolution. They contended that the transition from capitalism to
socialism could only be effected through minor social reforms, that is,
gradual changes. Lenin described Fabian ideas as "an extremely
opportunist trend" (see present edition, Vol. 13, p. 358).

In 1900 the Fabian Society became part of the British Labour Party.
"Fabian socialism" is a source of the Labour Party's ideology.

During the First World War the Fabians took a social-chauvinist stand.
For Lenin's characterisation of Fabian principles, see Lenin's article
"British Pacifism and the British Dislike of Theory" (present edition,
Vol. 21, pp. 260-65).

2See Frederick Engels, The Origin of the Family, Private Property and
the State (Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 3,
Moscow, 1973, pp. 326-27).

Further below, on pp. 393-95, 395-99 of the volume, Lenin is quoting
from the same work by Engels (op. cit., pp. 327-30).

3See Frederick Engels, Anti-Duhring, Moscow, 1969, pp. 332-33.

Further down, on p. 404 of this volume, Lenin is quoting from the same
work by Engels (op. cit., p. 220).

4Thirty Years' War (1618-48), the first European war, resulted from an
aggravation of the antagonisms between various alignments of European
states, and took the form of a struggle between Protestants and
Catholics. It began with a revolt in Bohemia against the tyranny of the
Hapsburg monarchy and the onslaught of Catholic reaction. The states
which then entered the war formed two camps. The Pope, the Spanish and
Austrian Hapsburgs and the Catholic princes of Germany, who rallied to
the Catholic Church, opposed the Protestant countries--Bohemia, Denmark,
Sweden, the Dutch Republic, and a number of German states that had
accepted the Reformation. The Protestant countries were backed by the
French kings, enemies of the Hapsburgs. Germany became the chief
battlefield and object of military plunder and predatory claims. The war
ended in 1648 with the signing of the Peace Treaty of Westphalia, which
completed the political dismemberment of Germany.

5See Karl Marx, The Poverty of Philosophy, Moscow, 1973, pp. 151-52.

6See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 1, Moscow,
1973, p. 137.

7Gotha Programme--the programme adopted by the Socialist Workers' Party
of Germany in 1875, at the Gotha Congress, which united two German
socialist parties, namely, the Eisenachers-led by August Bebel and
Wilhelm Liebknecht and influenced by Marx and Engcls-and the
Lassalleans. The programme betrayed eclecticism and was opportunist,
because the Eisenachers had made concessions to the Lassalleans on major
issues and accepted Lassallean formulations. Marx in his Critique of the
Gotha Programme, and Engels in his letter to Bebel of March 18-28,
11475, devastated the Gotha Programme, which they regarded as a serious
step backwards compared with the Eisenach programme of 1869.

8See Karl Marx, The Poverty of Philosophy, Moscow, 1973, P. 151.

9See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 1, Moscow,
1973, pp. 118-19 and 126.

10See Karl Marx, The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte (Karl Marx
and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. I, Moscow, 1973, p. 477).

Further below, on pp. 414-15 of this volume, Lenin is quoting from
Engels's preface to the third edition of the work (op. cit., p. 396).

11_Die Neue Zeit_ (New Times)--theoretical journal of the German
Social-Democratic Party, published in Stuttgart from 1883 to 1923. It
was edited by Karl Kautsky till October 1917 and by Heinrich Cunow in
the subsequent period. It published some of Marx's and Engels's writings
for the first time. Engels offered advice to its editors and often
criticised them for departures from Marxism.

In the second half of the nineties, upon Engels's death, the journal
began systematically to publish revisionist articles, including a serial
by Bernstein entitled "Problems of Socialism". which initiated a
revisionist campaign against Marxism. During the First World War the
journal adhered to a Centrist position, and virtually hacked the
social-chauvinists.

12See Karl Marx and I rederick Engels, Selected Correspondence, Moscow,
1965, p. tb').

13See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 1, Moscow,
1962, p. 22.

14See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Correspondence. Moscow,
1965, pp. 262-63.

15See Karl Marx, The Civil War in France (Karl Marx and Frederick
Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 2, Moscow, 1973, pp. 217-21).

Further below, on pp. 426, 427, 432-436 of this volume, Lenin is quoting
from the same work by Marx (op. cit., pp. 222, 220-23).

16The Girondists--a political grouping during the French bourgeois
revolution of the late eighteenth century, expressed the interests of
the moderate bourgeoisie. They wavered between revolution and
counter-revolution, and made deals with the monarchy.

17See Frederick Engels, The Housing Question (Karl Marx and Frederick
Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 2, Moscow, 1973, pp. 317-18).

Further below, on pp. 439-40 of this volume, Lenin is quoting from the
same work by Engels (op. cit., pp. 370, 355).

18Lenin is referring to the articles "L'indifferenza in materia
politica" by Karl Marx and "Dell' Autorita" by Frederick Engels
(Almanacco Republicano per l'anno 1874). Further below, on pp. 440-41,
442, 442-43 of this volume, Lenin is quoting from the same articles.

19See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Correspondence, Moscow,
1965, pp. 293-94.

20Erfurt Programme--the programme adopted by the German
Social-Democratic Party at its Erfurt Congress in October 1891. A step
forward compared with the Gotha Programme (1875), it was based on Marx's
doctrine of the inevitable downfall of the capitalist mode of production
and its replacement by the socialist mode. It stressed the necessity for
the working class to wage a political struggle, pointed out the party's
role as the leader of that struggle, and so on. But it also made serious
concessions to opportunism. Engels criticised the original draft of the
pro- gramme in detail in his work A Critique of the Draft Social-
Democratic Programme of 1891 It was virtually a critique of the
opportunism of the Second International as a whole. But the German
Social-Democratic leaders concealed Engels's critique from the rank and
file, and disregarded his highly important comments in drawing up the
final text of the programme. Lenin considered the fact that the Erfurt
Programme said nothing about the dictatorship of the proletariat to be
its chief defect and a cowardly concession to opportunism.

21The Anti-Socialist Law (Exceptional Law Against the Socialists) was
enacted in Germany by the Bismarck government in 1878 to combat the
working-class and socialist movement. Under this law, all
Social-Democratic Party organisations, all mass organisa- tions of the
workers, and the working-class press were banned, socialist literature
was confiscated and the Social-Democrats were persecuted, to the point
of banishment. These repressive measures did not, however, break the
Social-Democratic Party, which readjusted itself to illegal conditions.
Der Sozial-Demokrat, the party's Central Organ, was published abroad and
party congresses were held at regular intervals (1880, 1883 and 1887).
In Germany herself, the Social-Democratic organisations and groups were
coming back to life underground, an illegal Central Committee leading
their activities. Besides, the Party widely used legal opportunities to
establish closer links with the working people, and its influence was
growing steadily. At the Reichstag elections in 1890, it polled three
times as many votes as in 1878. Marx and Engels did much to help the
Social-Democrats. In 1890 popular pressure and the growing working-class
movement led to the annulment of the Anti-Socialist Law.

22See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 2, Moscow,
1973, pp. 178-89.

Further below, on pp. 454, 455, 456-58 of this volume, Lenin is quoting
from the same work (op. cit., pp. 179-80, 184, 187-89).

23The Los-von-Kirche-Bewegung (the "Leave-the-Church" movement), or
Kirchenaustrittsbewegung (Movement to Secede from the Church) assumed a
vast scale in Germany before the First World War. In January 1914 Neue
Zeit began, with the revisionist Paul Gdhre's article
"Kirchenaustrittsbewegung und Sozialdemokratie" ("The Movement to Secede
from the Church and Social-Democracy"), to discuss the attitude of the
German Social-Democratic Party to the movement. During that discussion
prominent German Social-Democratic leaders failed to rebuff Göhre, who
affirmed that the party should remain neutral towards the Movement to
Secede from the Church and forbid its members to engage in propaganda
against religion and the Church on behalf of the party.

Lenin took notice of the discussion while working on material for
Imperialism, the Highest Stage of Capitalism (see present edition, Vol.
39, p. 591).

24Lassalleans--supporters of the German petty-bourgeois socialist
Ferdinand Lassalle, members of the General Association of German Workers
founded at the Congress of Workers' Organisations, held in Leipzig in
1863, to counterbalance the bourgeois progressists who were trying to
gain influence over the working class. The first President of the
Association was Lassalle, who formulated its programme and the
fundamentals of its tactics. The Association's political programme was
declared to be the struggle for universal suffrage, and its economic
programme, the struggle for workers' production associations, to be
subsidised by the state. In their practical activities, Lassalle and his
followers adapted themselves to the hegemony of Prussia and supported
the Great Power policy of Bismarck. "Objectively," wrote Engels to Marx
on January 27, 1865, "this was a base action and a betrayal of the whole
working-class movement to the Prussians." Marx and Engels frequently and
sharply criticised the theory, tactics, and organisational principles of
the Lassalleans as an opportunist trend in the German working-class
movement.

25See Frederick Engels, "Vorwort zur Broschüre Internationales aus dem
'Volksstaat' (1871-1875)", Marx-Engels, Werke, Bd. 22, Berlin, 1963, S.
417-18.

26See Karl Marx, Critique of the Gotha Programme (Karl Marx and
Frederick Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 3, Moscow, 1973, p. 26).

Further below, on pp. 464, 470, 471-73 of this volume, Lenin is quoting
from the same work by Marx (op. cit., pp. 26, 17, 19).

27Reference is to the pupils of a seminary who won notoriety by their
extreme ignorance and barbarous customs. They were portrayed by N. G.
Pomyalovsky, a Russian author.

28Original footnote by the author: When the more important functions of
the state are reduced to such accounting and control by the workers
themselves, it will cease to be a "political state" and "public
functions will lose their political character and become mere
administrative functions" (cf. above, Chapter IV, 2, Engels' controversy
with the anarchists).

29The Hague Congress of the First international sat from September 2-7,
1872. It was attended by 65 delegates, among whom were Marx and Engels.
The powers of the General Council and the political activity of the
proletariat were among the items on the agenda. The Congress
deliberations were marked throughout by a sharp struggle against the
Bakuninists. The Congress passed a resolution extending the General
Council’ s powers. Its resolution “On the Political Activity of the
Proletariat” stated that the proletariat should organise a political
party of its own to ensure the triumph of the social revolution and that
the winning of political power was becoming its great task. The Congress
expelled Bakunin and Guillaume from the International as disorganisers
and founders of a new, anti-proletarian party.

30_Zarya_ (Dawn)—a Marxist scientific and political journal published in
Stuttgart in 1901-02 by the editors of Iskra. Four issues appeared in
three instalments.

31Reference is to the Fifth World Congress of the Second international,
which met in Paris from September 23 to 27, 1900. On the fundamental
issue, “The Winning of Political Power, and Alliances with Bourgeois
Parties", whose discussion was prompted by A. Millerand becoming a
member of the Valdeck-Rousseau counter-revolutionary government, the
Congress carried a motion tabled by Kautsky. The resolution said that
“the entry of a single Socialist into a bourgeois Ministry cannot be
considered as the normal beginning for winning political power: it can
never be anything but a temporary and exceptional makeshift in an
emergency situation". Afterwards opportunists frequently referred to
this point to justify their collaboration with the bourgeoisie.

Zarya published (No. 1, April 1901) an article by Plekhanov entitled “A
Few Words About the Latest World Socialist Congress in Paris. An Open
Letter to the Comrades Who Have Empowered Me", which sharply criticised
Kautsky’ s resolution.

32This refers to Sydney and Beatrice Webb, _Industrial Democracy_.

33_Socialist Monthly_ (Sozialistische Monatshefte)—the principal journal
of the opportunists among the German Social-Democrats, a periodical of
international opportunism. It was published in Berlin from 1897 to 1933.
During the world imperialist war of 1914-18 it took a social-chauvinist
stand.
